are flying away at college....
These are some pics from last year that I hadn't got around to scrapping yet....I can't believe how much the girls have changed in just a year...I am really not prepared for how fast they are growing up!
I will be posting a article on why I'm critical of Paul Williams, tonight or tomorrow.
65 gram flour
Later in the week, I think Thursday I looked at the wedding budget again and saw that we still needed about +R6000. At the same thime I realsied that the money I was planning to save from my April Salary would actually be needed in our May budget as a married couple! I felt for the first time that I could ask God for the finances and almost test Him. I had never asked before because I felt that I couldn’t rely on Him for finances. I have always had to work and save for everything, things don’t just fall in my lap! I prayed a simple prayer on the way home and ask God for the remaining funds needed for our wedding budget! And then left it at that. Yesterday we were handed an envelope at church, when we got home and opened it I told my mom and Stefan about the prayer that I had prayed and what I was trusting God for! We counted the money and it amounted to R5000! I was so overwhelmed! We are trusting that this amount will cover all the final payments necessary as He doesn’t make calculations mistakes! If He says He will provide then He does! There might even be change! I couldn’t contain my tears of joy and excitment and amazement that the God of the universe orchistrated funds for our wedding! How amazing to know that He blesses our marriage and even provides for it!
And now we are at my lunch hour.
Numpang is also suing the police officers for malicious prosecution.
I never have any less than 4 tins of tomatoes in my pantry. I start to have a mild panic attack if it goes below 4 tins. If I've got tinned tomatoes in the cupboard, I'll always have a meal, even if it's something simple like tomato soup. Having passata on hand reduces the steps taken for some recipes. I use it in a bolognese sauce, other pasta sauces, pizza topping, base for a chilli or other Mexican dishes, soups and other tomato based dishes.
Order: Caryophyllidae
Obviously the important bit here is that God is honourable and keeps His word and on top of that, He shows us His mercy and loving-kindness. The point I want to make is the second bit ....to your servants who walk before You with ALL their heart!
BLACK BOOK DETECTIVE in 1933
Mid way through the show we are all reminded we are outside experiencing music with no roof. The rain comes; hard, steady and constant. There is a mad break in the dancing as shoes are removed and hidden under trees with jackets providing further protection. The urge for movement is continued; barefoot hop hop, switch, barefoot hop hop, switch. A man turns his face to the sky and his palms upwards, he feels the cool rain on his skin and stays like that for a few moments. Getting in touch with nature all the more now, all of us.
I sometimes wonder how "hardwired" we are, human beings, to copy other people's actions, the impact this trait has on us and the benefits (if any) they might bring to us.
Highway 65 – The Bandits
Good Morning All, I am still having problems with my Internet, Ive had to use my Stepson's laptop to post, but at Least I can post my card for the Blog hop. For my card ive used this fabulous New image called Keith Keystone, isn't he great, ive coloured him with promarkers and fleximarkers, the backing papers are from Papermaina Portabello road, charms from stash (Yes I have handchuffs in my stash) lol and card candy from stash. Now If you are Blog hopping you should have come here from CG's blog and from here you should be heading to Charlene's blog http://www.crystaldolphins.net/blog/ You need to visit all the Teams blog's as one of us is the Mystery Host or Hostess and will be selecting a winner, the prize being one of the fabulous New release's.
Being attracted to fashion illustrations for a long time now, Zhenya is definitely one of the most talented illustrators I found in the broad world wide web. Her love to detailing her works unites highest precision and deep perfection. The realness her illustrations reflect mixes up with a richness in fantasy and always leave a fine note of a beautiful fairytale.
Cute, but make sure you don’t touch them or put your fingers in your mouth after you touch it. Wash your hands very well.
This woman accomplished what only Jesus had done to that point. She led others to faith in Jesus Christ. The disciples hadn’t even done that yet! John the Baptist pointed his disciples to Jesus but they hadn’t put their faith in him until Jesus convinced them of his divinity. But, John 4:39 shows that the Samaritans had believed in Jesus before they met him strictly on the testimony of this woman.
Mark Halperin - Time
3. Consider stopping the complaints about being “so super stressed”. Are they really making you less stressed or more stressed? (I could use a LOT of reminders about this one!)
This means that there is no one righteous, no not one. No one is able to say that they are embodying the reality we hope for. What we need is a confessing movement. Then we can take steps together to live out this new way of living that we have glimpsed in Jesus, not out of self-righteousness or guilt, but in the grace and love of the Prince of Shalom.
- 12/20/1941: attacked the oil tanker SS Emidio: killed 4 crewmen
Card 5x7
Walking Bum – Heavy Trash
So Dad Calls Lawyer.
only phone and our only GPS. Today’s post won’t be much since I’m pecking it out on nate’s Android with one finger. We will be on the hunt for cable TV and internet and possibly a landline to make it more affordable for our north american families to reach us.
Hello Friends, Happy Sunday. It has been a while since I participated in PTI Blog Hop. I just happen to love the colors in the inspiration photo this time and I was trying to figure out a card design for the Cas-ual Friday Challenge #45 - CAS Card using Pastels and Black and the PTI Inspiration image was perfect starting point.
We had an excursion planned for this day. It was riding jet ski's. Unfortunately, there was a problem. One of the jet ski's broke down and there were only 5, but there were 6 of us. Someone had to drop out. I looked at everyone else, and it seemed no one was willing, so I did. We were refunded my portion, and the gentleman who runs the excursion desk on board gave us even more of a discount towards our next excursion at the next island. Sooo, while George was away, I did some more walking around, and took some pictures. It all worked out fine, because George said the water was rough and I may not have enjoyed it.
Purple cardigan: Chadwicks. Plaid skirt: Chadwicks. Boots: Rampage. White jacket: Urban Behavior. Scarf: gifted.
At about 1:00, we closed up shop. Since the flyers blew away, there was no point in continuing. We didn't really find out until then, though. The Scout people called to tell us that they were back in town, and to come and pick up Jacob. I told Captain America that I'd take the kids, and he could go and get him.
An orangeish, somewhat cloudy pour, caused by what seemed like a significant amount of sediment at the bottom of the bottle. For a commercial beer, anyway. A generous white head forms quickly and slowly dissolves to a fine lacing on the edges of the glass and the surface of the beer.
I am forever asked why I am a renter and have not purchased a home after living in New York for over 40 years. The market in New York City is very different from anywhere else. There are over 2 million apartments for rent in the city with 65% rent regulated in some way. These regulations provide for below market rents and are a strong disincentive to move. The longer you remain in a regulated apartment, the greater the spread between your rent and the open market non-regulated places becomes - it is not uncommon for the difference to be 100% or more.
But all of a sudden he was telling a story, a funny anecdote about his aunt who he met in Davao. It was hilarious, and our laughter washed over my faltering words, over my doubt. He was louder than doubt, eyes grinning, his laughing face half hidden in the candlelight.
Stay tuned…..
I remember a while back, when I was in short pants, this beer marketed as a discerning choice. Of a TV commercial involving a modern chap of the day with smart clothes, job and apartment coming home and cracking a tin. What today would be referred to as a metro sexual. Not these days, Carlsberg is firmly in cooking lager territory. It’s the cheap lout of choice in the Spoons, it’s the £1.99 lager in the Greene King estate, and it’s 40p a can to those of us sensible enough to do our boozing in the comfort of our own home where you can sit in warmth and not have to rub shoulders with the type of undesirables that hang out in pubs.
Anyways, I hope that 2011 has served you well and 2012 will treat you nicely. ;)
KH: Iceland is pretty well known for these "weird" bands like Sigur Rós, Björk and múm. But Iceland has these really good heavy metal and hardcore punk scene, really big scene. And it seems to be turning into some indie rock scene. So Iceland is not only the ambient stuff.
I was dumbfounded. Haunted? Yes, he told me. Once he was falling asleep while visiting, and suddenly it got very cold in the room. Weird cold, he told me. He felt like he wasn’t alone, but he wasn’t afraid, and it was like that for about five minutes. I have never felt these things here. And yes, Adrienne, and Peg, and Colleen, if you’re all reading this, it was the guest room that you always stay in when you come.
By sheer coincidence, I got to share my birthday with the entirety of the kids’ storytime group. The theme was birthdays, and when the leader asked if anyone had a birthday recently, Isabelle piped up: “My mommy does!” I think one of the cutest things was another little 4-year-old girl telling me “Happy Birthday.” The kids made “cakes” out of homemade modeling dough for the craft. They brought it home and haven’t stopped making cakes.
Angel (US…Ernst Lubitsch)
The group, with David Lee Roth on lead vocals, still tours to this day.
I stood in amusement as the pink-footed cheerleader drifted down into the driver's seat from above.
Drinking tea. And waiting.
40 so
Of course not.
Each orc clan has one banner and King F'Yar carries one as well. Expecting the greatest losses at Kachas Pass, I attached the King to that front to try and mitigate losses due to Crisis Tests.
Yap Siew Ting allegedly stripped in front of Mr Ng and enticing him to do so in return. She then filmed Mr Ng masturbating himself and used the footage to extort money from him.
What else has been going on this week? The kids have finished school for the calendar year.
After a period of lethargy, I am motivated, and after periods of disorganization, my house and mind feel tidier. I've had a good sort-out, and I've given myself little tasks to tackle in my free time. I'm also making the effort to veg in a constructive way- reading, or making things, or working on my Thirty list.
- Audio books: They give me the creeps, but apparently audio books are one of the largest growing categories in publishing world-wide. They’re accessible, which is great. I have a friend who drove a lot for his job and he’d listen to them on the road. I dunno though. Unless John Cusack (cue heart fluttering) is narrating the High Fidelity audio book, I’d rather read Nick Hornby’s words on the page than listen to some stranger. It seems more indulgent that way. Just me and Nick. Call me old fashioned.
There are two short documentaries, Seven Women of Different Ages (1978), which looks at several ballet dancers, each one on a different day of the week, and Talking Heads (1980), a fascinating film where 40 different people of various ages are asked the three same questions.
Mark Henry vs. Sheamus was next up on the card. Daniel Bryan was assigned to be the special referee for this match, and because of that, a lot of “yes” chants started up. The match wasn’t anything special, but Mark Henry did pick up the win due to a fast three count by Daniel Bryan.
Look specifically at this verse in Matthew’s Gospel:
AND many more …
Ghee 1 tsp
Sample – I am on the Path to Coffin, I am looking a Friend of Levi to take me to a finger pointing north (indicating which direction they are traveling)
And a very special thanks must go to Sabrina, Kim and Claire, for organising, picking up and dropping off and for the continuous encouragement and support of Mooi and Tigerlily. A big thank you for the pics too. I couldn't choose so I posted them all!
3) The naturalistic theory of culture, then, insists that asking the question “nature or nurture” or “biology or culture” is the wrong question. Rather, we should be asking how our evolutionary biological form produced the cultural brain; how culture is an emergent property of brains in a society; that culture only exists in a body (culture is embodied) and could not exist without a body; that the beliefs, practices, and objects of any individual or group emerge over time in specific umbworlds; that the brain evolved to give a degree of agency over both the umbworld and its own consciousness to solve problems; and finally because culture is inextricably linked to the environment and because the environment is constantly changing, so is culture a necessarily emergent property of the brain, not a thing in itself.
The same lyric repeated over and over. Alex and I put napkins over our faces to conceal our shaking and laughing. Why did we think shaking and laughing with napkins over our faces would be less conspicuous than shaking and laughing without napkins over our faces? I don't understand our reasoning sometimes.
MS: So, anything that generates lust?
berry
Take a very tiny pointed object ( tip of embroidery scissors will do ) and wriggle this in carefully at the top of your biscuit , all the way through, and make a small hole that way.
My rating: ****
It would take a miracle you say?
In August, at ALEC’s annual conference in New Orleans, the education task force officially adopted Bush’s ten elements agenda. Mickey Revenaugh, the virtual school executive overseeing the committee, presided over the vote endorsing the measure. But when does Bush’s advocacy, typically reported in the press as the work of a former governor with education experience advising the new crop of Republicans, cross the threshold into corporate lobbying?
from darkness?
Just like the United States, it seems that the UK has extensive shale gas deposits (deep underground) sweeping right across the country. So what could be the potential health implications if fields of gas drilling wells were suddenly to appear across our green and pleasant land? This is the crux of the problem, the concerns of many NGOs lobbying to either halt or at least slow down this type of drilling in the UK, because no one really knows!
It is important to note that while oral arguments went badly for ObamaCare, oral arguments are only a small part of the overall process. It may seem that the law went down in flames, but we won't really know for sure until the Court's session ends in June and they issue their verdict. They vote today on the issue and will spend the next few months writing their opinions. Keep in mind, too, that their vote today might not be the final verdict we see this summer. Justices have been known to change their vote upon reading a particularly persuasive opposing argument. So we really won't know for sure until the published opinions are released over the summer. Anything released before then is mere speculation and should be regarded as such.
my cat Heather down last Friday
Of course with my wedding coming up I know I will be writing a lot of thank you notes and I've been preemptively looking for some really nice ones because the last thing I need to be doing is scrambling for thank you notes last minute so I don't seem rude and actually get them mailed out. Most nice cards will run you up to $2 a pop. More if they are personalized but this beautiful set of 12 cards is presonalized and only slightly over a dollar a piece! This is a great deal for those of us who don't feel great about sending out cookie cutter walmart brand thank you notes to everyone for lovely gifts! And you can pick your own colors on these! LOVE THEM!
An embarrassed looking Chav Harry turned to his laughing rocker friends.
One thing you should know about me is that I focus on college too much. I am an incoming Junior in high school and ever since 6th grade, I’ve been talking about my dream schools (Brown University and New York University is on top of that list haha. Hey, a girl can dream right?)
Rita
The word of the Lord came to Paul.
She had been bitten..
and discovered ourselves and did what made us happy??
Refined sugars and grains.
"Give thanks to the Lord, for he is good; his love endures forever." Psalms 107-1
I prayed deeply sobbing-muffled into the carpet. I know I am her best chance, I know if she loses the hope in me to love her and keep her safe, then at age 18, there is a good chance it could never happen for her….and that is haunting….
On December 11, 2010 the second oldest facility in the NFL, the Hubert H. Humphrey Metrodome’s roof collapsed, causing the Vikings to play their Monday Night game against the New York Giants at Ford Field. The Mall of America Field has been the home of the Vikings for nearly 30 years, but now after the expiration of their lease, they are looking for a new home.
We had plenty of bark left so we made a bark path inbetween the raspeberry frames which makes access a lot better for us. I say two raspberry frames, but it is now actually just one raspberry frame and a frame for a grapevine too! To edge the path and strawberry bed we have just used bricks that we have found on our plot since taking it over, and it certainly looks very posh..
- It entrenches centralised management of resources rather than enabling local initiative.
JT - Let’s be absolutely clear on the way we will speculate after this programme and that is that given what you’ve said about England and newco’s and how they come back in and deal with their debt and all of that stuff Rangers becoming a newco before the end of the season, the strong likelihood is that they would remain in the SPL without further sanctions but any other team doing that after the start of the new season it’s a different matter.
These include putting issues in your childs hair as olive oil, mayonnaise or petroleum jelly. This way you can eliminate lice in his source, eggs. Utilize bobby pins to split strands of hair that youve currently checked to steer clear of adding any extra time for this task for a long time. These parasites are species unique, which approaches that they have to human blood in order to survive.
4) Follow @steph_chows on Twitter. Leave a separate comment saying you did, or already do follow.
DRT sued defendants on patents directed to computer-implemented methods for retrieving information stored in databases without the need for human analysis of the source data. One of the claims in the patent recited a driver that automatically obtains information about the data structure of a data source "wherein said information about the data structure leads to optimization of a new database in which information from said first database is to be stored."
Karl Goodman (Ind) 437
On the journey I passed a field of fascinating and quite foreign sheep, so my next job is to search the internet to see if I can find out what they are. If I am successful I shall be back.
She suffered another two strokes in 2008 which left her unable to walk or speak. Nurses cared for her at the Lees’ Oxley Road home.
A: … the small lady.
Dan Straughan, Executive Director of the Homeless Alliance in Oklahoma City, voiced his support of this effort.
- Take a percentage off the retail price (if you know what it is)
- Probably since I was 16 or 17? I just enjoy making music with my friends and seeing the world. With the internet and myspace/facebook it became really easy for everyone to be in a band so I think it actually made it a bit harder booking tours. There was just so many kids doing it, it became too easy. Before that you had websites like "book your own fucking life" or you just knew people through other people. You had to mail out demos and actually make phone calls to people. As social networking became more accessible it actually made things harder for bands.
That is the sign at the border welcoming me back to the great state of Texas. This is the second snowfall we've had this year as we got 5 inches a week or so back. We desperately need the moisture so we'll take it in any form but at least one friend in Michigan tells me they have yet to get a single snowfall. I blame Rick Perry's disbelief in global warming for this early season snow. Either that or years of hairspray abuse has created an avalanche of dandruff on our Guv'nuh's scalp and each time he flies over to attend another debate turbulence shakes a few inches off only to fall on we commoners up here in the panhandle.
"Al doesn't know what's funny!"
But I digress. I can grow some things. Cukes and tomatoes like mad. Lilies love me. Azaleas and I are likethis.
worn by Kim, Curt & me
In a matter of a few years the group has grown to become the most significant rural/small community Latino grassroots organization in Illinois with a membership approaching 200 leaders. In March 2011 LUC organized the first “Brown and Black coalition” city council and school board candidate public forum in the history of Bloomington and Normal, IL (twin cities). This forum challenged candidates for their opinions on oppressive immigration enforcement on the municipal level and keeping Latino students in school. This was the only such Latino/immigration focused forum in rural Illinois. Other important organizing and issue accomplishments include:
"The life and martyrdom of Saint Thomas More have been the source of a message which spans the centuries and which speaks to people everywhere of the inalienable dignity of the human conscience, which, as the Second Vatican Council reminds us, is "the most intimate centre and sanctuary of a person, in which he or she is alone with God, whose voice echoes within them" (Gaudium et Spes, 16). Whenever men or women heed the call of truth, their conscience then guides their actions reliably towards good. Precisely because of the witness which he bore, even at the price of his life, to the primacy of truth over power, Saint Thomas More is venerated as an imperishable example of moral integrity.
- Critics once claimed that the Law of Moses could not have been written by Moses, since writing was largely unknown at that time (about 1500 BC). Then, the Laws of Hammurabi (1700 BC) were found. This showed that writing was definitely known at that time, and left no reason why Moses could not have written the Law of Moses.
But let’s face it, he doesn’t even need shoes to be hot:
The first thing that caught my eye was the beautiful penmanship of Harold. His writing on the back of a very aged photo of his wife.
As twelve years passed today, hopefully many more to follow, yet struggle continues... And still comrade-in-arms with me to share all joys and sorrow about to come...
In the series, the DP is more a convenient label for Dexter’s urge to kill, though various killing partners act as a kind of personification of the DP.
Here's what you'll need.........
Sueppel told the judge he worked at Superior Concrete in Iowa City. A man who answered the phone at Superior Concrete Monday morning said company officials would have no comment.
An occasional scream or cry, the doctor’s shouted orders or calls,
A wreath—but for the front door this time!
The cast gets ready to tape the wildly-popular weekly show. Sakhri, second from left, and Hangam, second from right, write almost all their own material.
If you care to check out Pirigwa, Indieful ROK still offers a couple of downloads (courtesy of Beatball Record) in the Korean twee pop introduction post.
Here are the most important aspects that will affect interests of European patent owners for their patent procurement and enforcement in the USA.
5-VICE:
And the recognition of its unlimited potential
My mother-in-law called me October 1st and said she had read my brother’s eulogy to her son and that she had cried and was very moved by it and to thank my brother. I don’t recall why she was reading it at this late a date, I had kept everyone’s eulogy from the memorial along with the guest register.
This morning it was clear many people seemed ready to write Lance off immediately. And it’s possible this was one Tour too many for the former champion; he’s not as young and strong as he was during his incredible string of victories. But anybody familiar with his story should know better than to assume the worst, especially right after the end of the stage.
-- Ending #1
I remember when you felt my heart
The best way to stand out is to try to out-work everyone else.
Naturally I was interested. They were neat, and they might make an interesting photo. I had Tracy scoop up a bunch in her cupped hands, and I snapped a photo.
Very little of this involves arrest and removal to the cells, she would arrange interviews of suspects, with appropriate adults, solicitors and doctors assessments of ‘fitness to be interviewed’ inside the unit.
Stuff hummus, cucs, tomatoes and cheese evenly in each side pocket. Serve with a side of Spanish olives, or honey dew.
A collection of stories so unique, so specific, so perfect as to need little more than that from me to send you straight out to buy a copy. Pancake died without ever really knowing just how good a writer he was and too young for us to know just how good and influential he might have become. As it stands several writers cite him as an influence and the warmth and reverence with which they do this is worth noting. His stories embody the area of West Virginia in which Pancake grew up, with authentic details and voices but these aren't simply stories rooted in a particular geography so that we can indulge in a kind of literary tourism, he also shows with a couple of stories just how formally inventive he might have been. Just buy the damn book, ok?
roll out the dough, keeping the shape of a rectangle, as thinly possible. you should be able to see your hands underneath it.
Sheet Metal Enclosure Design and Layout Tips And Tricks
Please let me know if you know of one I've missed! I'd be thrilled to hear about it! The more the better!
Brads.
Direct. VIII. Another duty of husbands and wives is, to be helpful to each other in their worldly business and estates. Not for worldly ends, nor with a worldly mind; but in obedience to God, who will have them labour, as well as pray, for their daily bread, and has determined that in the sweat of their brows they shall eat their bread; and that six days they shall labor and do all that they have to do; and that he that will not work must not eat.(41)
‘Chime’ by Franny Billingsley is not the tale of the Dead Moon, but it’s set in the same kind of world, and I feel sure she must know the story. Briony and her sister Rose live in Swampsea, a small coastal town surrounded by dangerous and wild swamplands inhabited by spirits who must be either avoided or placated: ghost-children, the Boggy Mun, the Wykes, and the Dead Hand - while the estuary has its personified tidal wave, Mucky Face.
Thank you, friends for coming by and sharing my heart today! Love you!
The story of a slave girl, a prince and their journey to love and acceptance is filled with enough action, romance, intrigue and fun to keep any reader flipping pages, wanting to find out what happened next.
Need to be somewhere after your dinner? Not anymore friend. Nope, you're not goin' anywhere. Whip out your sleeping bag and jammies, because this could take all night. There's a process. A timeline. And it must be respected. I'll lay it out for you in a real-life situation...
“Your Precence Lord”
It takes 8 hours to “dry” but it is still very tacky at this point. Be sure the project is in a place where you won’t have to move it for 72 hours, the full amount needed to cure. If you must move them for some reason (say, because you accidentally glued them to the table…) then do not touch the tops.
Overall, I'd say we gave the house a fresh look. I would like to find some new pillows for the rocking chairs, paint the light fixture on the porch, and plant shrubbery, but I'm trying to pace myself and my pocketbook ;) I know all these Mizell men want me to calm down for a day or two! Ha! Ha!
The monument was erected in 1921 in memory of William Jolicoeur, a member of the American Expeditionary Forces killed in France during World War I. In 1952, it was rededicated by the Disabled American Veterans in honor of three brothers, Alexandre, Henri and Louis Gagne, all killed during World War II.
Hierdie is nie 'n Shoprite adertensie nie, maar ek dink hulle is slim. Hoop hulle voer n paar motorfiets helmets ook uit. Nigeria is n lekker afset gebied vir SA se produkte. Doen so voort shoprite.
Guinness; Ireland, Dry Stout, 4.1% abv
What the leaders said at the summit:
As spring was approaching, and all those great vase fillers start to come out, I wanted to show you some easy and cheap-o glass displays you could MAKE. I know, it seems contrary, but I like the FILLERS so much, that I needed more containers for all the good stuff!
Of every single one
If his claim is true that I broke up with him three times, I must be paying every act of rejection with a year. If so, by now, I have fully moved on and have opened up myself to possibilities of getting in a relationship with others. The truth is, no matter how I try, or maybe I have not tried hard enough, there is never a day that passed that I have no thoughts of him. Yes, never. Call me pathetic, I accept it.
They apparently are seeing that this book can be used to bring the public up to speed much faster than they had expected, and with much less risk or hassle.
Anyone else find it weird that I had an autistic child who struggles with attachment issues? How the hell did I manage to pass that one along? :S (Thankful that I have therapy this aft. I’m primed and ready to go! More later, possibly).
I have a bedroom reno that has gone on far too long, a garden in desperate need of help,
I bought a heart-shaped pocket pie mold from Williams-Sonoma a while ago (after my cousin Angie showed me her round latticed pocket pie mold - so adorable!), and when Valentine's Day rolled in it was the perfect time to put it to use!
Win cash prizes for your research!
He's all ours.
Given all this stuff, zombies would be more sad than dangerous. They would likely dehydrate and die within a few days at maximum, probably less time. If you thought to bring a gallon of water and some granola bars up on your roof with the sabotaged ladder, you’d outlive the lot of them.
Grace felt a feeling of fear creep over her. Nobody knew she was down here. All of her relatives currently believed her still to be watering the pomegranates in the greenhouse at Auntie Lou’s charity garden party, and most of her friends were dead. The only other person with whom she considered herself to be on good terms was now snuffling at a lettuce leaf in a cardboard receptacle formerly home to some sturdy all-weather walking boots. To escape the chamber she would have to climb 807 stairs in double quick time before her captor pressed the ‘Turn staircase into super-slide’ button she’d noticed on her way in – either that or climb up to where that shaft of light was coming from, but she was pretty sure it was just a powerful lava lamp in an alcove and not a path to the freedom of above-ground. The vigour of her spleen-hitting efforts had reduced her utensil to a splintered wreck – no good for hand-to-hand combat – and all of the other weapons in the room were marked with an orange ‘not to be used by under-18’s’ sticker, and she wasn’t one to break the rules.
Procrastination teaches us that we have choice,
To my family and friends...
3 TBLS butter
Data collection on the Nile provided the thread that wove together early attempts at collaborative development. However, on its own it falls far short of providing a sound framework for development and of overcoming differences and disputes between states. This partly reflects the concern felt by some states that earlier efforts were little more than a distraction from key water allocation issues.
We packed our overnight bags, got into the little car and started to head to the hills. Our destination – Peppers Ruffles Lodge & Spa, in the Gold Coast Hinterland.
Joe Yasutake was nine years old when Executive Order 9066 forced his family to leave their home in Seattle, WA. While they and hundreds of other Japanese-Americans were boarding the train for the assembly center in Puyallup, WA, a news photographer took a photograph of the crowds waiting to be moved out. Joe and his sister instinctively smiled for the photographer. Their photograph appeared in the Seattle newspaper with a caption pointing out how happy they appeared to be because they were being treated so well.
Here's a video of One Short Day: the Broadway, not the Spalding, version. But think 'haemorrhoid' when you hear 'emerald' and join me in a childish giggle.
10: Unchained Melody
To discover that one is loved in return should really bring the lover down about his beloved. “How’s that? Is this person modest enough to love even you? Or stupid enough? Or—or—. . .”
*a fucking really/very expensive car
The air was soft, the ground still cold.
Feb 22 Writing Break
As we crested a couple more hills, we dropped into Cheddar, on the back road.
And so it happened. Without struggle, without entreaty or spoken request, God did the miraculous in her life. I imagine the moment she first felt her child flutter in her womb, the first time he kicked against the walls of her diaphragm, the first sign of her ‘baby bump’; it must’ve been an emotional experience as she walked through that precious nine month journey she’d resigned hoping for. It must’ve been an exceptional event when she heard the sound of her baby crying for the first time. Her life had forever changed on multiple dimensions.
When it was first released I saw Kung Fu Panda twice, the first time was deliberate and the second time was somewhat more circumstantial but generally speaking it was boring, unfunny and flavourless. Thus concludes the most I will ever write here about Kung Fu Panda.
Well, it’s not about Detroit in the sense that it’s not about cars. It’s two suburban couples – one of whom has just crashed their way in. They’re squatters essentially in an empty house in a "first-ring" suburb of a declining American city. So the title, Detroit, is meant to suggest that kind of a city, and it’s never referred to in the play.
8.I'm a natural blonde! I first dyed my hair chocolate brown in 2006 and I've kept it that way ever since!
What does this puppy have to do with me, my work, or my blog? Absolutely nothing. Some total stranger was selling these 5 week old puppies on a little grassy knoll near a shopping mall and I took a few pictures of them. Our lives intersected for a few minutes. Mine and the boy selling the puppies as well as mine and the puppies.
Uno
The trick to cooking mushrooms is to let them cook for a long, long time, until they get really brown and crispy. I started with about two pounds of oyster mushrooms, and at the end it cooked down to less than a pound. I chopped the mushrooms into small pieces and added it to some heated olive oil. I had so much mushroom I had to use two pans; it’s important not to overcrowd the pan, because the mushrooms won’t brown properly if you do. Don’t add salt, or anything else, just let the mushrooms cook. Stir them only once in a while; the less you touch them, the better they will brown. When they are dark brown and crispy, add salt to taste, some cumin and coriander, and the juice of a lime. Be prepared for the lime juice to sizzle loudly in the pan. Stir to coat everything, and then you’re done. Trust me, these are really delicious.
Ft. Collins, CO, October 8, 2010 –Clip a card in your spokes and wear your Halloween costume all weekend long…Tour de Fat is back! New Belgium Brewing’s traveling celebration of all things bicycle rolls through 13 cities this year, raising money and sharing bike love. The Tour de Fat finale is once again in Austin, coming to Fiesta Gardens on October 30.
11 Harlequin (Sounds Of The Seventies, 09 January 1972)
Christa Faust – Bootleg
he best time to get a disability insurance income protection policy (or any other form of coverage) is just prior to a disability!
By 1906, it was one of several steel foundries in the Long Island City area that catered to the needs of New York City's riverfront manufacturers.
So I was expecting that kind of film with this one. I assumed that maybe I can get a laugh or two, hopefully, despite not finding most of the film funny.
We are now gearing up for Halloween - a favourite time of year here at Hunnypot House. We will be decorating the fireplace today, and making Halloween cupcakes and carving pumpkins over the weekend. I also have a small collection of Halloween bears being released on Sunday too (you knew bears would feature in there somewhere, didn't you?!). Here are last year's mini bears - the ones this year will be a little bigger!
But in the end I was true to my roots. A trifle should have cake, jam, fruit, custard, cream, maybe a dash of sherry, definitely jelly and, of course, hundreds and thousands to decorate. Or silver balls and a plastic reindeer at Christmas !!
“Women are not in the wrong when they decline to accept the rules laid down for them, since men make the rules without consulting them. No wonder intrigue and strife abound.”
It’s a continuing process. We look at launching the mobile website as a beginning, not an ending. We’ve already made tweaks and upgrades in its first “official” week, and we have many other features in the pipeline. And of course we’ll keep an eye on analytics both for mobile and the regular sites to see what’s working/not working and what other features become relevant.
Was Jason Campbell the most talented aquisition in the league this offseaon? No. Will he be a Pro-Bowler in Oakland? Most likely not any time soon. But was there a greater upgrade made at any position this offseason? Definately not.
Article Marketing - Learn How To Use It And Boost Your Sales And Serps
Puzzled and still shaking I went back inside and continued jiggling my bait. I heard the scratching again. I felt numb as chub, when I discovered it was the zipper of my ski jacket rubbing on the wall of the ice shanty, as I jiggled my bait.
Here is my list of hopes and dreams...
We got in the house, Dennis tried to calm her down by cuddling with her on the couch, but nothing would do the trick. We decided to cave.
The Guidance also suggests that associated persons to undergo training. This will be particularly relevant for high risk associated persons. The better practice is to require such anti-bribery training as a part of compliance contractual terms and conditions and then provide such training to the highest risk third party representatives. But the Guidance does recognize that a company may wish to encourage associated persons to adopt bribery prevention training. If this is done, the training should be evaluated and appropriate records of business partner training be submitted to the company on no less than an annual basis.
All arrangements were taken care of by Mr. Chamaria . RT 34 was only to ensure that the Tablers do turn up at the event with their wives in good numbers . The invites for the event was sent on mails and the usual calls were made to the tablers to attend the meeting . Thanks to the response from other Tables , the number of guests from our fraternity exceeded 150. There were also around 50 guests invited by Mr. Chamaria from his own family and business – and all to showcase the great work Round Table India is doing . Is it really possible to get more selfless than that ….. ( In fact , after the event , one of his friends came forward and expressed the desire to donate for one of the schools by RT 34 )
Small things are coming back to me about Jacob's birth lately, like the fact that the first attempt at an IV didn't work and they had to try again. I had forgotten about that until I saw a picture with a bandaid on my arm while I was holding him.
I do remember this being my favorite of the whole group though. I am a sucker for the stout's and porters, probably its my chocolate addiction. The beer pours a very dark brown almost black color with a nice tan head. It's not very thick when compared to other stouts, but this didn't negatively affect my experience. It has a very sweet cocoa malty aroma and tastes almost like it smells. The cream taste comes from the vanilla and sweet milk flavors.
Mother: "Get out of the room!"
Have you seen different attitudes to learning from boys and girls? Do you use apps? Have you found them to be a useful tool?
Don’t let them take our freedoms away.
Were they all wrong about government and Obama right?
Despite these flaws, the movie still held up.
"Inspirational!" roared whatever chimp TV3* had anchoring their coverage. I was left feeling cold by his words, though impressed by his subsequent 15 minutes of handshakes and baby-cuddling. Perhaps missing the start of his speech meant I hadn't had the chance to get swept up in the whole thing, but what he said certainly reads an awful lot like candyfloss, designed to elicit cheers from an expectant crowds and play very, very well amongst Irish-American voters - a fairly key demographic in a country where around 20 percent of the population recently claimed they believe Obama to be a Muslim.
What happens if Romney loses Illinois? – According to Alan J. Steinberg, who served in the EPA under the Bush administration Santorum will become the new favorite to win the nomination.(New Jersey .com)
A couple of years ago, while remote viewing Obama and others of recent infamy, I saw things I don’t even want to talk about. Under certain circumstances, remote viewing is as easy as daydreaming.
A setback that might keep regular people from achieving this kind of pop star success is that you generally have to be quite attractive to do so… or at least be able to sing. But if you can write well, that shouldn’t stop you at all! Look at what Scott Neustadter and Michael Weber did with (500) Days of Summer:
He also said that the High Priest Ananias had:
of our illicit, sensuous nightmares.
Hopes and dreams
Strawberries (washed with tops cut off)
laptop, using our new names. He’ll print them when we arrive, and as far as anyone will know, we’ll be who we say we are.
"How I wish,
We married exactly 3 years after that first 'date'- May Day weekend 1984.
The String Quartet No. 3 essentially serves as a response by Shostakovich to the reception of the Ninth Symphony. Shostakovich essentially used his string quartets as a place to pour out his feelings, things that he was forced to repress when writing his symphonies. Whereas he was often accused of “formalism”, in his string quartets he felt free to utilize various traditional classical forms – and to stretch them out, revise them, bend them to his will. He does all of these things in this wonderful string quartet – in the space of 5 movements, we hear whimsy, unrest, agitation, sadness and mourning, all within a space of under 30 minutes. Shostakovich playfully utilizes various traditional classical music forms (a fugal developmental form in the First movement, a Passacaglia used as the basis for the morose Fourth movement, the Fifth movement cast in the form of a Rondo), while at the same time discarding the traditional four movement format of standard string quartets for five movements.
11. Ken Nordine - You're Getting Better
How did I know it was a lie? This is because M.E. Bailey, the master watercolorist, had told me so. I visited his blog, here, one day in early May 2010, and found he had made a large, particularly dark, section of his watercolor disappear. I e-mailed him to ask how this miracle had happened, and he was nice enough to e-mail me back. I figured that my problem in the past was that I did not follow his directions carefully enough. So I pulled out his old e-mail and followed his directions meticulously, and it worked!! Actually I was so happy that it worked that I wanted to stop at this stage and call it done!
● Increases liquidity while eliminating monthly expenses, thereby providing a greater monthly income stream
The next day the owner of the farm came up to me. "I see you've met Bob then." I nodded. He shrugged his shoulders, adding "Well, he is what he is."
As you breathe-out feel the warm air as it leaves your nostrils
In today’s society where sex is becoming more and more cheap and looked at as a goal to reach or a prize to win, its folk like myself who are trying to keep the beauty of the act alive and kicking for the GROWN FOLK out there who enjoy it the same way I do.
Now off to bed after a long night spent around lots of people, because I am truly exhausted...
Islam fails four major tests that religions should fulfill:
and blogged about in, yes, february.
I have had it disabled for months now and have never once received a spam comment. I have received many a spaz comments, but that is not something Blogger can assist me with. Word verification is the downfall of society! (is that going too far?)
In stunned disbelief I look at my chest, at the hole and the blood. I look around for help, but my buddies are busy fighting for their own survival.
God is not like that !
So is it any wonder that the EDL’s Tommy Robinson tried to stop these Islamists spouting their filthy rhetoric? He only expressed in action what the majority of British feel in their hearts. Most Brits too are sick of the appeasement of Islamists like the MAC and Islam generally.
--It was particularly difficult to micromanage the musicality when I wanted to make syncopated movements or play with a shifty melodic passage. Though it worked from time to time my overall percentage was much lower than when dancing close. And in general the dance took on a kind of strictly flowy quality, kind of hazy and soft, legato. It was tricky to give it edges or accents.
“Oh look, our angel is wake up. Oh… he is more beautiful when he wake up and yell like that.” Say one of those man that most them are old men.
We took a turn off the main two lane road, onto a smaller two lane road. It meandered down and around through beautiful trees and over a little dam. We both pretty much uttered breathy wow's at the same time as we made the turn and caught our first glimpse of the lake. It reminded me of the movie "On Golden Pond" and "Funny farm" both at the same time.
I originally pictured this blog being a forum for me to write anything and everything I could think of about books, and so from time to time I will throw in the occasional unfocused entry. One regular post, inspired by the man and the column which inspired this entire blog palaver, will be: Books Bought.
We will be printing postcard style flyers for the event, and will be happy to send these out so that you can invite friends, customers and anyone you think might be interested..... the more the merrier and we all rely on "networking" to make events go well.
Friday marked the second day of an unannounced parole sweep targeting 94 Fairfield, Vacaville and Dixon parolees. Conducted by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation's adult parole division and allied local, state and federal law enforcement agencies, the sweep resulted in 22 arrests of people found to be in violation of their parole terms, authorities said.
Studying for a Masters in education has always been something I have aimed for since I first started my teaching training qualification and indeed my training at South Bromsgrove High School. For me it is a natural progression within my career and something that I believe could not only benefit myself but also the school in which I work. During the last two years I have been given the opportunity to develop myself as a leader within South Bromsgrove’s leadership structure and a Masters degree in educational leadership would allow further development. I am particularly interested to research what makes an effective leader within the school environment and how leadership can develop throughout an individual’s career.
Tristan
Not only is it exasperating for those of us who know the quality of some of the work being shown in regional Britain, despite the frequent malaise in the media. With critics often treating the regions as ‘other’, like some colony whose attempts at culture must be picked over anthropologically by the ‘educated outsider’. I think it also unveils something deeper and darker about our media: its lack of understanding of the Britain outside London and the narrow talent pool it so often draws its staff from. Perhaps the BBC move to Salford will shift this a little. We live in hope.
Finally after watching the whole of the palace which was done in an hour or so. One decided to head back to the city. There was some time left so one could catch on some other places before it was dark. Hussain Sagar Lake was such a spot.
That's the Brew Dog public relations ethos. They've applied time, money and effort into making themselves 'be' the most irritating child in your class, the one who nobody ever dared to tell to 'shut up.'
I’m afraid of all the changes that are coming down the pipe. Living together is a Big Deal. Sure we’ve been together for 3 1/2 years but this time has never included all those every day minute details that everyday life together entails. Bills, housework, etc, has never been part of the mix. Part of me is nervous about this.
Stearyl Betaine – See Stearic Acid.
GINGRICH: I think that there are a number, and I think for example of — of when you think cabinet, I think for example of Susana Martinez, the governor of New Mexico. You know, at the cabinet level I think of somebody like Ileana Ros-Lehtinen. I actually thought about Marco Rubio on a slightly more dignified and central role, then being in the cabinet, but that’s another conversation.
This smash album was a real labour of love, and I can't wait to fill it with beautiful memories of our trip to the city of love! I'll post some more photos when I get back and it's full.
“Where were you when the earthquake hit on March 11th?”
Can't wait for Piege to open his new gastro/tasting/laboratory upstairs from Thoumieux. Should be soon. A Robuchon-y open kitchen and democratization of high gastronomy for a select few communal diners (20 covers). Opens in March 2010.
When I received my order, they had included a small complimentary bag of Alaea Hawaiian sea salt. Here's what it looks like.
It was bad.
I popped a few sweet potatoes along side.
Applicants would also be required to submit a non-cumulative description for IDSs submitted after a first Office action and after allowance. A non-cumulative description is one that "describes a disclosure in the cited document that is not present in any other document of record."
baby butterflies
Now Mary could believe that “impossible” thing could happen to her.
I wanted to post the official music video, but it was the shorter version of the song, so instead I am posting this video. Though it maintains a still picture throughout, and is accompanied by lyrics, it is the extended version. In the full extra minute at the end, Tim McGraw’s voice is highlighted and the runs they do together, for me, is mesmerizing. I really love this song and I hope you will too!
But something just promoted an Exception
01-Big Youth-Fire Burn
Its my poor schools
~ J.C. Ryle
What are your thoughts, ideas, things you see relative to the half billion dollars someone will probably win tonight?
O, how I giggle at the men of the past:
I've told you time and time again that I HATE math. I'm pretty much the only Asian on this planet who is painfully bad at math. I probably had many disappointed friends in HS who copied off my homework only to discover that I didn't know JACK about prime factorization. (BTW, my 10 year reunion is next month...CRAZY!)
Whiskey: I am hoping to finally start the corn whiskey project once the temps drop into the lower 80's, so that makes short term moonshine by winter, and putting it in oak for about a year. I am hoping to get into a cycle so I can age it for three years and always have some on hand.
Do you have
So while I hope that the new fluff will be just as good as the new models, I don’t have high hopes on that front. After all, for me the best version of the Chaos Space Marine fluff is still that found in the 2nd edition Codex. And that was a looong time ago.
“A Corkonian cannot answer the hard political questions, however much it pains me that while the Wall may be broken in Berlin, Walls still stand a relatively short distance from my back door.”
Here is the cover:
It's the first time in a looong time that I've lived in a house that isn't haunted. And oddly, it just is making things feel empty.
These are the types of studies I intend to work on during my residency in Spain at Can Serrat in 5 days. I'm excited to find myself there and see what else inspires me too; maybe landscape. But do tell me what you think of my line and color studies. I'm ever so infatuated with them right now.
The lasting power for the three fragrances are good. I have found I Love New York For Her to be too fleeting on me. It lasted splendidly on my co-worker Gela. This made me jealous. I Love New York For Him was a smash with drydown and silage. The bully co-worker got compliments from men and from women. I Love New York For All has a very powerful drydown. You will smell chestnut and coffee all day.
Tomorrow I'm cutting the sleeves off all of my Guy Rover shirts and showing off the guns! (For those of you who didn't understand the Pocari Sweat post, that was a joke.)
I'm one of those people who can't seem to get a good foothold in the middle class, so this is an issue for me. Although I know that neither party is going to do much of anything to help the poor/working class or recent college grads who can't find work, and nor do they want to help. Their main concerns are getting big donations, maintaining their corrupt relationships with special interests, keeping their benefactors happy, and getting re-elected. But these discussions may help force the issue into the national debate and thus force the candidates to address the issue. Voters want populist, pragmatic solutions and this is an issue which could actually help Progressives in November. It would help President Obama position himself as the more reasonable, populist candidate against an opponent who is literally sponsored by (and who literally represents) big business. Why Obama's advisers are reluctant to take a more populist/progressive position is a mystery to me. When issues are broken down piece by piece... to a level where Americans have an understanding of how policy will actually affect them, the more populist & progressive position almost always wins more public support. When progressives fail on PR, fail to communicate with the public, attempt to move too far right, allow Fox & other media to define candidates and refuse to fight back, progressives lose.
For my makeup look last night, I went with slightly dramatic eyes in shades of deep purples, a plum coloured blush, and a nude lip.
Her life went off the rails when she learned her mom was killed in a foreign earthquake. All the pills in the world couldn't numb that pain. When her aunt visits her rehab center and asks for help on a project, Hope assumes she means scrapbooking or maybe knitting.
Video Production Editing – What You Need to Know About Your HD Camera
During the 1950’s Modise was a member of the township gang called the Spoilers in Alexandria near Pretoria who were fighting another gang called the Msomis. He was physically very strong. A boxer and a football player who could look after himself. He later became a truck driver.
“I miss my family,” she said. “I have this daydream I play out in my mind all the time. I imagine that a plane has landed in the lagoon and you and I are right on the beach when it does. We swim out to it and the pilot can’t believe it’s us. We fly away and as soon as we find a phone, we call our families. Can you imagine what that would be like for them? Being told someone has died and having their funeral, and then they call you on the phone?” (Anna)
Some people can not even go out of the house on Friday the 13th. That would be called Friggatriskaidekaphobia, the fear of Friday the 13th. Our county just called off school because of the snow. I really think it was because we have some frigga people at the board office. Well, maybe. But, I don’t understand this problem. I can understand some phobias, like driving over a bridge. I mean, the damn bridge could fall down and you’d be stuck in your car, floating down to the bottom of the river. Not good. But, to be afraid of all things Friday the 13th is a little strange to me. Are they afraid of black cats stepping in front of them while they walk under a ladder after breaking a mirror in the house?
By Rebecca Steffes, RPA, LEED Green Associate
Ordinary people of both parties care about the 88 million unemployed. They care about an economy that is not creating jobs, and a debt and deficit that keep growing without the slightest effort to rein in spending.
2 cups whole or 2% fat milk
The fans that found themselves whelm-deficient by her return are also the same fans who criticize the WWE for being too predictable. Once again we’re subject to the hypocritical and moody musings of those who want to be “right” more than they want to be “entertained.” It’s unfathomable how one can logically rant about a company being predictable and then gets mad when something they didn’t or couldn’t have predicted happens.
Our tea parties happen at once a week, and give us a chance to go across each other's blogs, chit chat, and do what you came here to do, meet some amazing like-minded women.
With 6 restaurants on the list, the Asian contingent has secured its position on the gastronomic map and the event organiser took the opportunity to announce the launch of the new Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants awards at the ceremony, which will be held in Singapore in February 2013. The awards, which are also sponsored by S.Pellegrino & Acqua Panna, are welcomed by top chefs from the continent including Ignatius Chan from Iggy’s in Singapore, who took the Best Restaurant in Asia title at no. 26. He said, “Asia has a long culinary history and we offer a deep, diverse and rich gastronomic landscape. Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants is a fantastic platform to educate and showcase some of the greatest Asian restaurants to the world.”
As a child of the 50's, 60's and 70's I was part of the TV loving crowd. But as we grown up hippies began to look around it was decided, by most, that TV was unhealthy. We all know the statements, "rots your brain", "robs time from real life", "read a book". I stood up to the criticism and advice to get rid of my "boob tube" but eventually caved and threw it out. I bought a new one about 4 weeks later but it was a valiant effort.
“Ooh, sarcasm,” I say lightly as we step alongside each other. “A lost art if there ever was one.”
returns a brighter dawn
– VA May Shift Monitoring of Sex Offenders From Troopers to Civilians
I knew my 4:30 goal was out the window but that a slight PR was still a possibility... and when we finally crested the last hill for the final 3-mile downhill finish, my hip pain subsided, as did the cramps I was having on my inner thighs. I was able to pick up the pace a tad.
I couldn’t wait to see if the design was going to work.
Suggested reads
all my precious crap that beautifies my territory. Guess I will have to pretty up the
Water tight plot – A fully developed plot, with subplots, helps to create a complete and flawless story without the kind of plot holes that can jar the reader and put them off.
- the Japanese burned 150 American prisoners alive when they saw American Liberator bombers coming to the rescue
Duties:
papers:Making Memories, Bo Bunny, Bazzill cardstock
Of sandalwood
“I did not see a temple in the city, because the Lord God Almighty and the Lamb are its temple. The city does not need the sun or the moon to shine on it, for the glory of God gives it light, and the Lamb is its lamp. The nations will walk by its light, and the kings of the earth will bring their splendor into it. On no day will its gates ever be shut, for there will be no night there. The glory and honor of the nations will be brought into it. Nothing impure will ever enter it, nor will anyone who does what is shameful or deceitful, but only those whose names are written in the Lamb’s book of life.” (Revelation 21:22-27)
My first clue that they really hadn’t thought this thing out was seeing that they were expecting 6000+ runners. The NYRR and Prospect Park Track Club (PPTC) races held in Prospect Park are capped at a max of about 4000. And if they lap the cap is even smaller. The road around the park is just over 3 miles, so clearly there would be lapping going on. Red flag number 1. Then the location for number pick up was announced. I didn’t expect an expo since it was only a 10K. But they picked possibly the smallest running store in the city to hold the number pick-up. It was crazy. Then they randomly put all of us who registered early – before there was an “estimated finish time” on the registration form – into the last corral with a ridiculously slow estimated finish time. So a lot of us were having to change our corral. I’d brought proof of time and was put in Corral 7. By them simply putting a little round sticker on the bib and writing the new corral with a sharpie on the dot. I found out my friend who I was planning to run with was given the choice of 7 or 6 because our estimated finish time overlapped. It was not a problem to change my number when I got home. And as it turns out no one bothered to check the numbers anyway. But back to pick up…they were running out of bags and shirts so that people were having to get them the next morning. Fast forward to then. Less than an hour before the race, only the porta potties where registration was going on (yes, they were still registering people…total cash cow) were unlocked. None further up the course, which many of us had to pass based on the subway stop we got off at. We got into the corrals, and then it was announced that they were delaying the start by 15 minutes because people were STILL registering. Once we got underway, the race itself was fine. No big problems, though there was much lapping going on. After, when it was time to collect my baggage, it was horrible. We’d put them on rental trucks based on our numbers. Now…if we were going from Prospect Park to somewhere else in Brooklyn, this would have made sense. However, there was less than half a mile between the finish village and the registration village. There was no need to move the bags PERIOD. But they did. Now at NYRR races (the regular ones…not the NYC Half or NYC Marathon), yes, you go in on your own and get your bag, but your bib is checked against that tag on your way out. Here, we found that bags were being and had been tossed out of the trucks at random, thrown between trucks, and essentially were not being watched at all nor was anyone bothering to match up bibs with tags. Thankfully as far as I heard no one’s bag was stolen, but that’s sheer luck really. Basically it was a big cluster and I’m not doing it again. Especially when I can run laps of Prospect Park any day I choose for free.
From Monmouth we travelled to Barry (Y Barri), and after a small detour following a satnav that took us into the middle of a housing estate (Muse: never trust a satnav!) we arrived at Bro Morgannwg school, where I spoke to a large group of Year 7 in their hall and also a reporter from the local paper. I was very impressed that the children at this school have all their lessons in Welsh... though thankfully, after introducing me in Welsh, their teacher let me do my talk in English.
“This is Sofia Coppola for Louis Vuitton. It’s simple and doesn’t have too many tchotchkes; I like that it has no hardware. I use it every day. I’m not kidding: Every. Single. Day.”
If you have time today, please vote for my photo. If you have a little time tomorrow and the next day, or whenever you log on again, and can vote again, that would be great. Please "share" with all of your friends to expand my voting pool, too!
in the morning dew
A hack out today for me and Remy. A little bit hesitant on the way out, but willing to go and felt active and together, and good in the hand. We stopped for him to have a little munch of grass half way round and, as usual, he was more active on our return journey.
Well, obviously, the volunteers will continue to use their common sense and distribute food to the hungry in a hygenic and sensible manner as we always have done. Heck! We might even use a notepad, as we were tonight urged, to count how many homeless we feed when we arrive and do a quick head count for whatever strange purpose is needed in that respect. We will not, however, most definitely not, take lessons on how to treat the homeless from a Council committee who do not give a flying one about the fate or sufferings of the very people for whom the Council is their first point of reference and from whom these very same people receive jack sh*t in terms of respect, compassion, housing or even food.
The seriousness of this issue can not be under-estimated with regard to the reputational risk to the BBC and to Al Jazeera. How these programme makers respond will define their trustworthiness as news organisations and discover to the world what comes first, money or the truth?
I have not yet had the opportunity to return to the Amazon to work with Ayahuasca again. Though I will return as soon as I can, I’ve been too busy with the new life I gained after I came home. Allow me to give you a little personal background to set your understanding of the scale of the change that happened to me.
Pastor Steven Furtick was speaking “on keeping your God sized vision when there is no sign of it happening anytime soon. Pastor Steven is a dynamic pastor with a passion for impacting a generation. It’s definitely a message you won’t want to miss."
And can I tell you just how much that completely wrecked me?
The three of us put feet to the trail a little before 6 am. We ran the steady, entrance climb up to the beautiful, grassy meadow canyon of Achenbach. Once passing through the initial climb and smaller canyons, one enters this meadow that also contains interesting, volcanic tuft, slabby rock outcroppings. We then split off on a narrow, loose, rocky side trail that followed a ridge up to an unnamed peak. The climb was mostly a power hike with a few spurts of running. Eugene mentioned this climb was his Grand Canyon training run. From the parking lot to the peak is a climb of about 2000 feet. We caught the magic hour as the sun lit up Achenbach and smaller canyons as it floated up from the White Sands of the east. After a break at the summit and dreaming of running the neighboring ridges and meadows we descended. The run down was fast but the loose footing made for a precarious descent. Each turn had a cactus, rock or sharp, or dagger-like yucca. A lot of the run down was more of a skree ski on the loose rocks. I couldn’t help but laugh out loud at the fun and absurdity of the run.
I’ve said so much about this issue all week that I’m not sure that there is much more left to say. While most of the country has been embroiled in diagnosing Cheryl Miller from the safety of their web browsers, my interest has never been whether she is mentally unstable or not. In my mind that’s an issue for Cheryl and her medical practitioner. My issue has always been, was proper procedure followed….the trial will clearly shift away from whether Miller is insane or not, to one of either breach of Human Rights or breach of Industrial Regulations.
If you are looking for a teachers gift or the girl that does your hair you can not go wrong with Yankee Candles.
These are the schools I (usually) root for come tourney time, to get that proverbial monkey off their back. They are the 20 schools that have been in Division I the longest without making a single appearance in the NCAA tournament. To keep what follows in perspective, just remember that George Mason University, which made the Final Four a few years ago, didn’t even exist until 1972.
wossy: I'm finding your boots a little bit disturbing.
a full moon shining through bare branches
My aunt has bird feeders in her yard, and this is the first year the the bunnies have been at it.
Also, people needn’t go out of their way to see what you want to communicate. If they are your “fan,” your update will populate in your client’s or potential client’s news feed automatically.
About a million years ago I mentioned helping out a friend with a photo shoot (shot by the very talented Rex Barrett). Basically, I helped out with the set and told the girls they look fierce while standing by the photographer. I was kind of just along for the ride while everyone else did the real work of modeling and shooting.
Tonight, I had one molt that was VERY unexpected. Sarva, my smaller Rose Hair, did the deed after 4 months of barely eating. She looks beautiful, and the best part is that I am almost certain that she is a GIRL! YAY!! I measured her through the enclosure, and I am putting her at around 3 1/2″. She gained an entire inch!!
Or maybe he's wondering if anyone's noticed that he's inexplicably sporting a goddamned Hitler 'stache. To answer your question, MJ: no, the soul patch does not make that okay. No, no, no. Just no.
April 27 - Yvette Vickers, model (Playboy) and actress ("Attack of the 50 Foot Woman"), 82
And then somewhere in between then and now, I let go.
Day two of the test saw conditions markedly improved from yesterday and with both Mark and Sebastian in the car, the team was able to work through its full run plan.
Once almost exclusively white, universities now reflect the racial composition of the country with more people from groups disenfranchised by apartheid climbing the ladder with a degree or diploma. (Please refer to the following ToxiNews articles "Education is key to South Africa's Problems? " and "Who then, was John Langalibalele Dube? - Jacob Zuma")
Green tea
1. Dan Deacon - Snake Mistakes
Oh yeah, and the black chick dies when she gets stabbed by the little boy from across the street. I know, just go with it. Apparently the demon can possess people now! And I guess nobody noticed the little kid leaving his house with one of mommy’s kitchen knives…methinks better parental supervision would be a good idea, perhaps. Not to mention the silliness factor is only multiplied when the demon jumps out of the kid and into the dying girl – why he did that I do not know, as clearly she’s dying and will soon be of no use to him – and puts on his best Exorcist impression. By which I actually mean worst, and cheesiest, Exorcist impression. Sounds more like a castrated frog.
group, a fundamental tribe in our Yuman linguistic inventory.
Roses, framing a door but look again at it's partner, yes boxwood. This composition is the classic middle of the road style.
On this sixth day of our novena we are called to consider the great concern St. Pio of Pietrelcina had for the sick. Many anecdotes of personal healings describe the great love our Lord had for him in allowing St. Pio to be the avenue of the healing touch of God. Padre Pio recognized this gift and did not squander it, rather offering this grace over and over to those who would ask, seeking God's will and living it. His confident, familiar recognition of the power of God in all things is a call for each of us to acknowledge the sacred and mysterious in our lives.
Step 2:
STEPH: What does Kostas find appealing about her?
I recently read a pretty disturbing article written for a small newspaper that was posted on its website and quickly removed by the editor. Some have opined that the inflammatory article was posted for page hits, and page hits it did get. I’m not linking to it or naming the paper because I’m not into helping that paper get more page hits, and the article has been taken down anyway. But the editor’s apology note was qualified with the statement that the author’s attempt at sarcasm missed the mark. Having had some experience with sarcasm, it got me thinking. Sometimes when I think, I write. Sometimes when I write, I share. (Although I share very rarely here these days. Sorry, yo.)
I must say a big thank you to the talented Jo Davis for giving me a GDT slot with Crafty Sentiments Designs.
Then it went out of print and people on the internet started charging 30 bucks for used copies and even more for new copies. Every couple of months I'd check the internet, usually to see the prices had gone up.
One Pack of 5 White Pearl Medium Crown Pins
Sunday I was travelling home but I had set the day aside to look around the Kunsthistorischen Museum. I am so glad I did. What a totally amazing collection. I started by climbing the stairs up to the special viewing platform to see the Murals by Gustav Klimt. It was wonderful to be elevated up close to those iconic women, high up above the ornamental main starway. Next I headed straight to the painting rooms.
The Passover Murder by Lee Harris
This one reminds me of an old school True Romance photo. But that's misleading because the phrase is much cheekier than what you'd find in those magazines. It says "I should come with a warning label" in Portuguese. I love the whole idea behind these culturally diverse designs. I like to think of it as having a truly worldly wardrobe. Have any cultural styles caught your eye recently?
Through a wierd twist of fate, I was able to take advantage of a cancellation and get back in today. Yeah, that was a good thing. No more processing today. Today was all about what happened yesterday and last night and preparing for more of the same (because this work will bring more emotional pain) by building some more/better coping mechanisms into my life.
The week after Christmas, I worked from home. There was definitely work to do, but the pace was pretty relaxed and I was able to spend another week of quality time at home with Theresa and Abby. :)
Arms - wide heart to heart next to same hole
Happy Tea~Day!
My arms were made for more than just baby-holding.
One of our cooks ran a bakery in her previous life, her specialty was as a pastry chef. And while her other food is really good, her baked goods and deserts are . . . a force to be reckoned with.
Next up, a rather brave lady became Dr Ahmed's guinea pig for the live demonstration of dermal fillers. This particular treatment was something Angela had been considering for ages, so we paid close attention. First, Dr Ahmed drew lines (in biro!?!) all down the lady's left cheek, explaining that he was going to replace all the natural collegen that had been lost through the aging process. The result would be a nice natural plump cheek and less visible lines - ya dancer! Next, we were led downstairs to one of the treatment rooms where Dr Ahmed got to work filling a GIANT needle with the filler. I think everyone in the room gasped a little at the length of it. It must have been about the length of my index finger. From here he proceeded to push said instrument of torture right along the biro lines on the lady's face. It took AGES and straight away her cheek began to ooze blood, swell up and bruise. The room was really hot and after 2 glasses of wine, both Angela and I had to get some fresh air before he had even finished the treatment. It was every bit as scary as I had envisaged and actually more invasive than I had previously thought. I think even Angela is having second thoughts...
Sketch and Composition
So why am I singling out this guy?
I am a born and bred southern girl living in Utah...LOL!!
He’s fought for everything.
When getting out of my pickup truck to fill up with gas, I'd like to not have to mess with a jacket or unbuttoned shirt to keep my crazed handgun concealed and calm.
Curing the Mediocracy
On a very different note, I am currently very busy getting ready for a holiday. Next week I will be heading off to spend 10 days in Hong Kong with my mother shopping, eating and sight-seeing. I can’t tell you how excited I am! My mother and I have been talking about taking a holiday together ever since I was 16 and it is hard for me to believe that 10 years later it is finally happening. What’s more, this will be my first ever trip outside of Australia. I’m a little nervous, actually…but mostly just excited!
It was actually the Eric Gregory award, to pre-empt your next question. It was all kind of new to me, that I could write – I had come from an Art School background and was 29. You need to be under 30, and I just slipped in the door at the last minute. I don’t tend to enter many competitions – though I did enter the Mslexia the year before last and was commended. Perhaps this should encourage me to enter more…
Anyway, this is worth seeing. Well acted and well written. The music isn't bad from what I remember, but not overly memorable. It's long, but what Bollywood film isn't really?
2 lies
In checking him out, I realized this was not MY son. It was too small, and had too much hair. It sure looked like Mona’s son.
According to legend, Oset (Aset/Auset/Isis) wanted to be a goddess, so she conjured up some old foot magic and created a serpent, so that when Ra journeyed across the two lands. The serpent would poison Ra with its bite and in order to save him. Ra would have to reveal his true name to her based upon the belief that whosoever knows his true name could control him. As planned, Ra journeyed across his kingdom and when he came upon the serpent that lie in his path, he was bitten and became very ill. In agony Ra called out to his children to save him but none knew of a cure except for Oset. When Oset came to Ra’s aid she called him to reveal his true name to her so that she could drive the poison out him. Ra after much hesitation tells Oset,
What we had that night with Ajay, was a recent Especially Selected and one from ten years ago. You can notice the difference in the band between the old one on the left and the new cigar on the right hand side of the picture
Thanks so much for all of your well wishes!!
Red wine or white wine?
Written-By – Garrie Lammin 2:06
Joy doesn’t mean that your heart isn’t breaking; it’s the knowledge that no matter how badly your heart is broken, it’s all going to be worth it. Joy is contentment knowing that God has everything under control, that He loves us as tenderly as a mother and offers us better protection than the strongest of earthly fathers. Joy is hope, knowing that someday He will make everything new.
I cleared my throat and that seemed to break his train of thought. He took a deep breath and in the most soothing of voices said, “So, will Tuesday be a good day to come out?”
Mittens: 3
Amazing right? The colors are a bit subdued for me, but I love love love this fabric. I got enough to make a substantial garment, but I'm going to have to brain storm the best garment for this fabric.
First, the toll booths were creating heavy traffic on the Tetteh Quarshie and Motorway Circles so they were moved. Then electronic gates were introduced to eliminate fraud at the cash point and immediately, traffic conditions worsened, and now the new tolls didn't make it better. Has it occurred to anybody that the toll booths have outlived their usefulness on the motor way? The demarcation between Accra and Tema is long gone. It is not the fault of the average worker that Accra has escaped planning and we must live so far from the business district. It is enough punishment having to spend more on fuel and drive long distances , increasing our stress levels is a price too high for a nation as poor as Ghana. I couldn't believe it when the last government created more toll booths around Accra. I think our governments are just insensitive to our needs because we always turn out in our numbers to vote for non-performing leaders.
The Spellbound series starts off with Spellbound by Fire and flows into the sequel, Spellbound by Swords. The basic theme of the series is that abuse of all kinds is intolerable, unacceptable and most of all, the cycles of violence can be broken by those who have been victimized by it.
Yup. Song just switched abruptly to “Call From the Vatican.” Gonna have to watch the movie. Good thing I just ran a bath – I’ll soak for awhile, relax, and watch it for the . . . . I don’t know . . . . 20th? 30th? time.
It is also a great opportunity for Brasov to market itself to the rest of world as a great place to come on holiday and a great place to invest in.
POP – all the helium escaped from a big gaping hole and I plummeted to the ground.
Mrs. Carter raced to the front of the room and announced sternly “Everyone, we will be exiting out the front door into the interior hallway of the main building next to the cafeteria. I want you to pick up your Social Studies Book, the big thick book under your desk, and bring it with you. Now we will start with the row the farthest from the door, quietly walk single file and do not stop on the way. Gladys, you need to make sure the room is clear since you are the last one on your row. Can you do that?”
The text of the oath reads as follows: “In the exercise of the powers of the President of the Russian Federation I vow to respect and uphold the rights and freedoms of the individual and citizen, observe and protect the Constitution of the Russian Federation, defend the sovereignty, independence, security, and integrity of the state, and serve the people in good faith.”
Yours, securely zipped away,
Or so it seems.
lest I rend you and there be none to deliver you.
We’ve been going to our appointments in the Overland Park office now, since that appointment is connected to the hospital where we’ll deliver. This was our first scheduled appointment there and realistically it’s just as easy as going to Lawrence.
For about a month this spring, NELP reviewed job postings on four of the biggest online sites. It looked for postings identified by employer or staffing agency while also, it says, “seeking a diverse sample from across the United States.” This, I take it, means that it didn’t look at all postings from an identifiable source.
The story of Socrates is a kind of fiction. This is not to say it is untrue. The story represents one of the great half-truths of Western civilization. It is a story that is recounted time and time again in undergraduate classrooms and introductory texts – the self-congratulatory tale of a simple man with a sharp mind and an aversion to nonsense, made all the more poignant for the fact that Socrates was condemned to die for his activities. Socrates is the Christ of philosophers. As with Jesus Christ, there is a tendency among the faithful to see Socrates in an apolitical light as a humble teacher and sage. Yet Socrates, like Christ, was a revolutionary of his time. Through his way of living and speaking to his fellow citizens, and through his constant quest to test the truth of the oracle’s statement and to settle the matter for himself, Socrates dealt hammer-blows to the cultural cement that had grounded Greek society for centuries.
The song Offering by Paul Baloche is sung in many of our churches, but not everyone knows the original first verse which has a definite Christmas theme to it. Can I suggest introducing this other verse to your congregation if they are not already using it? The music on this version is by the group Casting Crowns.
What I'm not ok with, is my stomach having stretch marks. I hate these things, and mine are AWFUL. I put all kinds of oil on my stomach. I dont know why the hell I have them. My mother hardly has any, and I'm pissed. Not that it really matters at this point, but I'm never going to look good naked again. FML. The worst fucking part? yeah.... I couldn't even see them. My mother was looking for me, and had to bring me a mirror so I could see them. I seriously want to cry.
Hopeful immigrants who applied before Feb. 27, 2008, to come to Canada as skilled workers will have their fees returned and be told to apply again under new programs that put greater emphasis on their work skills.
YG03(these are yellow greens, which I like better than most of the plain greens - the 95 and 93 make a nice olive green for some foliage and then layering the 03 on top of those brightens them up for more intense greens)
The artists began their journey at Shannon Harbour on Monday and will stop at Belmont, Rahan and Tullamore before arriving in Edenderry on March 24th at the weekend.
This is Greg Koch, CEO of Stone Brewing, pictured, I am informed, at the National Homebrewers Conference in San Diego last month. And yes, that face on his tee shirt is, erm, Greg Koch.
This is significant because it was research suggesting this premise to be a valid one that led the Labour government to introduce the regulation limiting the maximum class size for infants to 30 in 1998.
For the record, I will be taking my act on the road, performing for babies all over the Midwest. I do noises, I shake my body, eat toes, get noses, and an array of other skits that have babies rolling in their seats. (Literally rolling for some because they can’t crawl or sit yet. Others, only wish they could roll in their seats….someday little ones, some day.)
When I was pregnant with both boys, the doctor's office inquired if we would like to have genetic testing. Because I worked at the CF Foundation, I immediately declined. Many people found that confusing. I worked for a cause that was 100% genetic and yet, we had no inclination to find out if our child could have the disease.
I swear it's that horseshoe shoved up his ass.
"His exact words were... 'We want Katie'", she finally replied.
Home from surgery and everything went well! Feeling ok. The only pain is in my hand where they had the iv and a slight headache. Other than that, just a little sleepy.
“Someone with the username “Flash Gordon” has been trying to dead agent (lol) me on the Ex Scientology message board by trying to convince everyone that I lied about the attack and am a horrible, untrustworthy person.”
Just updated the webpage, go check out my brand spankin' new cards to embroider! Other things you can do to them: color them in, stamp on them, use them as templates for traditional embroidery, hmmm, I'm sure I'm missing something. Above is a finished card, below, the card before!
Kirk: I had the House Blend. It was nice, yet subtle. Had two potfuls. Next time, something else for sure. I liked that lunch and tea was offered. Loved the lemon curd too. I agree with Marianne about service and music.
Each cut has been a minor annoyance, but not enough to bring people out on the streets.
For a very narrow piece followed by a wide one, you might want to put in a break after the picture, then two (or more) breaks before the next section of coding.
Oui, ça veut dire “aussi.”
this is the best time of the year in savannah!
1. What is your favorite magazine? Mailbox Magazine
Well, in today’s other lesson from Paul’s letter to the Corinthians, we may have a starting point. The first sentence of that reading is “Don’t you know that you yourselves are God’s temple and that God’s Spirit lives in you?” 1 Cor. 3:16
Want More? Christian culture is so fascinating, it can get pretty addictive. Fortunately, there’s no shortage of it on the Internet. If you want to get to know the Creation Museum, check out their ministry at Answers in Genesis. If you liked reading about the Cornerstone music festival, you can find out more about this year’s event. If you were fascinated by the alternate realities of Left Behind and Hell Houses, you should know they were ripped straight from the pages of Chick Tracts. Keep up with the chastity movement at Chastity.com, get political about abortion at LifeSite News, or get it on – but only if you’re married! – with sex advice from the Christian Nymphos. Then, once you’ve found your favourite flavour of fundamentalism, hit Google to see what else you can find out there! (Be sure to comment, so everybody at Bookshelf of the Mind can follow what you’ve found.)
I went to the telephone instead. Even though
Here's a closer view of the euphrobia, growing around a pasque flower, little bluestem, liatris, narrow leaf coneflowers, phlox, and some plants I can't remember the names of. I haven't decided if I'm going to keep the irises in this area.
been 20 years of civil war and 25 years of governmental neglect. This has taken the
But speaking of exciting - I am very excited to share my latest creation with you. I was very inspired by a shabby chic tutorial I saw on the Stampartic blog and I knew the moment I saw it that I wanted to give it a try. Luckily, there were a couple of shabby chic challenges this past week with even more great inspiration and examples, so I just had to make a card. This really is quite a different style than I am used to and I found it very challenging.
The Book of Jeff
A 6-3 guard from East Texas Baptist, LaGarde led the Tigers in scoring with 20 points per game, whereas Barnes (a 6-6 forward) finished in essentially a dead heat with Schleigh (another 6-6 forward, but more on him later) for the Comets’ scoring title. That, however, does not cover the entirety of LaGarde’s scoring skill. LaGarde took 32.5% of ETBU’s shots while he was on the floor, an impressive rate which indicates his importance to the Tiger offense, while making 54.6% of his twos and 34.8% of his frequent threes; in comparison, Barnes only took 26.4% of the Comets’ shots while posting marks of 50.4% and 34.7%, respectively. These numbers translate to an advantage in effective field-goal percentage of 0.537 to 0.511 for LaGarde, indicating that he was the better shooter from the floor even though he had to carry a heavier load. LaGarde was the better free-throw shooter as well (0.762 to 0.689), resulting in an even greater advantage in true shooting percentage of 0.575 to 0.540. However, since scoring is not the only basketball skill (though it may be the most celebrated), let us now look at LaGarde’s secondary skills.
O God, you gave your servant Ambrose grace eloquently to proclaim your righteousness in the great congregation, and fearlessly to bear reproach for the honor of your Name: Mercifully grant to all bishops and pastors such excellence in preaching and faithfulness in ministering your Word, that your people may be partakers with them of the glory that shall be revealed: through Jesus Christ our Lord, who lives and reigns with you and the Holy Spirit, one God, now and for ever. Amen.
"We are on the verge of a global transformation. All we need is the right major crisis and the nations will accept the New World Order." - David Rockefeller
Thanks for joining me!
RATING OF 5 LIPS
I took this shot at the university a few months ago, while Emma was hard at work preparing for an event. Emma complains that the lighting was bad and the photos were not to her usual standard, but I wanted to show you the skirt on an actual working day. It is functional and pretty, and can be individualized quite a bit.
While we were hiking (or not, as the case may be) at Point Lobos on Saturday, an electrical storm came up off the ocean and swept over us rather suddenly. It was the first time I have actually been afraid to be outside in a storm. It was CLOSE. We saw lightning strike the hills not far off. The park rangers were driving around saying over their speaker systems, "the safest place to be right now is in a parked car - not under a tall tree." We were running back to our cars during pretty much the whole storm, though. We got pelted with big, fat raindrops and were soaked by the time we made it back. And by then the lightning had ended as well. Thankfully, none of us got zotted. It was quite the adventure! After that we drove back to Asilomar and dried off and ate lunch at the very nice living room connected to Mom & Dad's room.
( yes...... we can discuss worms and chinese food in the same sentence...... N U R S E S )
Level 8: MP Cost: 25, Damage: 222%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 3 times, 8% chance to stun the enemy for 2 seconds.
We want to build doable plans:
Since I know no one I had no idea if there were any fast women there. Since Minnesotans tend to be fit it's hard to tell the gym rats apart from the runners. But the other women in my group recognized a few women but it turns out those women were there for the half marathon. I didn't really care about racing anyone, I was just looking for someone I could use as my pace setter. I suck at pacing in the best of times...I just wanted some feet to follow.
Day 1: Junk Drawer
juice of two lemons
3:9 – Theophylact draws a textual parallel I hadn’t seen before; in Matthew 27:51 the stones of the earth are broken. No doubt the tumultuous events immediately following Jesus’s death had an impact on gentile observers (such as the centurion at Gulgatha), meaning that God very well did raise descendants of Abraham from the stones. At the same time, I don’t want to downplay the immediate meaning of the text, where John is clearly speaking in a more literal sense to render silly the Pharisaic claim to Abrahamic blessing.
The injustice is compounded when the voting public — his voters — are screwed because we only gain insight into his position on pressing issues of the day much, much later; “after” he gets elected and decides to go all maverick on us (no, not like Tom Cruise in “Top Gun”; besides his B2 licence ride doesn’t qualify).
And you wonder
Looking back, I guess maybe we should have seen it coming, but when you’re eleven years old, you don’t really expect it. I think Dave knew, suspected at least. He and Dad seemed to get into more and more fights, mostly about how we needed him there, how it wasn’t Dave’s job to run the family, it was HIS. I don’t know if the fights helped or hurt. All I do I know is that one day, Dad packed three suitcases into the back of his beat-up old Subaru, told Dave to take care of things while he was gone, then looked at me with a strange expression, ran his fingers through my hair, and with a kind of sad little smile said, “Try not to forget what I look like.” I thought he was kidding around.
We will look back on this week and realize that something changed. I have given numerous interviews wherein I espoused the benefits of thorough vetting during aggressive contested primary elections, but this week’s tactics aren’t what I meant. Those who claim allegiance to Ronald Reagan’s 11th Commandment should stop and think about where we are today. Ronald Reagan and Barry Goldwater, the fathers of the modern conservative movement, would be ashamed of us in this primary. Let me make clear that I have no problem with the routine rough and tumble of a heated campaign. As I said at the first Tea Party convention two years ago, I am in favor of contested primaries and healthy, pointed debate. They help focus candidates and the electorate. I have fought in tough and heated contested primaries myself. But what we have seen in Florida this week is beyond the pale. It was unprecedented in GOP primaries. I’ve seen it before – heck, I lived it before – but not in a GOP primary race.
Well, my friends and I were a bit late to the party, so I think we probably missed all the really desirable items, or the lady who left the joint with four trash bags of clothes took it all and intimidated the other women.
parading as real, living improvements.
Hat - medium oval
seems kind of odd.
Our letterbox is in weathered plastic and ugly, so I won't make the extra effort on capturing it on camera.
So, may you learn to tie your shoes properly. May you seek the truth in your beliefs and traditions, but above all, may you seek love and peace and unity among the brotherhood as you work to bring light into error.
Chuck said, "I'm going to raffle him off."
“Thank you for coming in on such short notice. Please, have a seat, and we’ll get started.”
At the same time, I've got a bit of flash fiction to share with you all!
tell me what it is
“Make sure you light the little ones on the bottom,” Brulee said.
The beer and spirits were cheap. Three bucks for beers & cider. Five for Jim Beam & Bundy Rum. About fifty or more locals turned up and we all had a foot stomping, doublebass, banjo & spoons night. You should check the Hillybilly Goats out. They play Hillbilly Blues, Bluegrass, old time Blues, the guitar, banjo, harmonica, double bass & spoons are all played with energy and vibrance. Some of their reportoire includes songs from the early 1700s. Real Hillbilly Roots music, the precursor to Blues, Country and Rockabilly. Everybody had a good time at the tin shed. By ten thirty things wound down and I wandered, well, staggered back to Haleys and my comfy bed. I had walked down earlier, rather than drive the minibus a kilometre to the gig. I could have driven, but I tend not to drink and drive anymore. I’ll leave that for the idiots to do.
“Oh please, Mum, let me do it!” piped the intrepid youngster. “I NEVER get stuck in windows!”
Level 13: Recovers 130 HP and 39 MP every 4 seconds.
"Did you see someone run through your yard a minute ago?"
Becomes moth-eaten,
I guess one of the most typical features of the western genre, both implicitly and explicitly, is the way it places the whole concept of masculinity under the microscope. The rugged nature of the environment and living conditions in the old west meant that traditionally male qualities were highly regarded, as such it’s only to be expected that western movies should frequently analyse and comment upon these. Even the humblest programmers tackled this theme, although not always in the subtlest of ways. Phil Karlson’s Gunman’s Walk (1958) approached the issue head-on using the framework of a family drama, and also worked in some interesting and important comments on evolving race relations and changing perceptions of law and civilization on the frontier.
And where is a good place to get cute, but inexpensive shoes?
The Rankin Home 219 E. Ridge
I hope you will join in the journey, and welcome to Wonderland!
Now Skylar starts to wonder which she would rather hold onto—her sanity…or her life.
As always, follow me on Pinterest to see my color of the month (and months past) and all of the fabulous things I find all month. I even have a purple cocktail planned for this Friday! Hooray!
- She'll Be Coming Around the Mountain
“What’s that kid?” Mike had been trailing behind them, watching Marley.
‘Forward, the Light Brigade!’
Pour mixture into pan (I wrap foil around the bottom in case the pan leaks a little). Place in a cold oven. Turn oven on to 375 degrees. Bake for one hour.
Last Monday evening I had to carry a 25kg (55 lb) sack of pig food pellets in from the truck. I hauled the bag up onto my ample shoulder and staggered into the laundry where I keep the animal feeds. It was a distance of 10 metres, I was huffing and really burdened by that weight.
If author advances were to disappear overnight—I would suggest—the established, best-selling authors would be the least hard-pressed about their loss. In fact, it is our dear humble mid-listed who would toss and turn most during those first few ‘no advance’ nights. Any author who invests time, energy and talent into writing a book should be rewarded for what they have produced by a prospective publisher. But the thing is, they are—the reward is already called a royalty—the profit on each book as it is sold.
-Damian's tactics work, as he manages to decapitate the Talon, which is an injury I'm pretty sure it won't be coming back from.
Ultravox Vienna UK
Egomancers are treated with respect, even fear, in the Heteronomy. An experienced magus is considered a member of the aristocracy, but it’s rare that they seek too much overt political power, fearing reprisals from the majority. An egomancer grows up knowing the dangers of over-reaching. One who attempts to weild too much power can easily drain himself dry.
In a large bowl, stir together the cream cheese, salsa, lime juice, chile powder, cumin, cayenne pepper, onion powder, garlic, parsley, scallions, and 1/4 teaspoon kosher salt. Add the chicken and cheeses and stir until evenly distributed. Season the mixture to taste with salt and pepper.
'The father's job is to teach his children how to be warriors, to give them the confidence to get on the horse and ride into battle when it's necessary to do so. If you don't get that from your father, you have to teach yourself.'
When Madeleine McCann went missing in Portugal, her mother, Kate was reviled for having left her children asleep in their bedroom as she had dinner with her husband. Never mind the fact that the restaurant was opposite the bedroom and that she went back regularly to check on them. Kate was by all accounts a good mother but because she fell short of the standards set by a sensationalist media, her image was forever tarred and the world blamed her for the loss of her child. She faced further abuse as she appeared composed despite the loss. Gerry, her husband was equally composed but because he was a man, he was not judged for that.
MaxInputParameters: Maximum number of input parameters a Runbook you want to initiate may have
Yesterday, as I was sitting in my recliner and working on my laptop, I fat, round, black and yellow spider ran up my chair. I was, needless to say, startled and quickly flicked it off my chair. As I carefully got up to get something to squish it with my heart was beating faster than normal. The anxiety was definitely going to be a problem for a little while. I grabbed a paint stir stick and whacked that horrible little creature a good one. Grabbing several tissues I picked up this not quite dead and still wiggling creature and squished it between my fingers. I then disposed of it into my garbage can. I’m sorry, but you just had to come into my domain. That is an automatic death sentence for any spider. I know that your death was not quick and, I’m sure, very painful and for that I am truly sorry. I will do my best to provide a quick and painless death next time. Though for you, little black and yellow spider, it really won’t matter.
Me : (Frown face)
The vendor’s monopoly on information has been broken as consumers make use of online tools and sites to generate their own communication about features, benefits, quality and brand. Consumers will increasing rely on each other for information and advice. Viral marketing, social networks, blogging and online webinar/learning will afford more educated customers/.
I ran my first 30K run yesterday, and even though I injured my foot 5 weeks ago and haven’t trained for the last 4 weeks, I was able to finish it.
I had set aside this day to restructure my website, only to find that the software that created the site had been erased during a recent upgrade of memory.
192 kbs mp3 (no re-encoding)
Dive anyway.
The proponents of cutting off old people's benefits say that ''they should have saved up enough for their retirement.'' Are these knee-jerk types cognizant of the fact that even $1 million in savings is not enough to retire on in today's economy? And as things are getting more costly all the time, how much would it take to live on for years, given today's inflation? Far more than many people can realistically save, given today's economy.
I’ve included a 10-minute video, quite possibly made by a family member, as it has a fascinating photo montage of the Yeagers from the early 20th century to the present day. A video of the televised news story can be found here.
2. Disregarding the importance of a head line – Grabbing the reader’s focus is 50 % the battle and making sure you maintain the reader with you all through the blog post is necessary. Employ a eye-catching head line making use of numbers (such I’ve performed for this post) or even a question that your readers desires responded to.
April Record Breakdown -
Mkay, apparently I’m supposed to write something here but I honestly don’t wanna and don’t see the point, however because it means skittles for me, I’m gonna do it. First of all, you ain’t gonna get my name, no matter how much you beg. All you get is that I’m a person who surrounds themselves in dreams. I’m a violinist, and no, I don’t play classical, I play whatever the hell I want. I write stories and I draw. If you got a problem with that, then get lost. Now!
Funny how things change when the boot is on the other foot, isn't it? If I condemned 7/7 as 'an attack on every Christian in the world' or 'every free man in the world', I would be dismissed at best as a crank and at worst a racist.
Here's a selection of pages from the first issue, courtesy of Panini UK and title editor Simon Frith.
The last of Claypool’s resolve bled dry; with a trembling hand, he slowly reached up and humbly plucked a straw from Emerson’s hand.
The story, the cover, the blurb, the title, the author bio, the typography, the margins, the chapter headings, the page numbers, etc. are all designed. These books are designed, inside and out, top to bottom. They are crafted to perfection to convey exactly what the reader is looking for. As a reader I should understand the story just by looking at the book, that is the ultimate goal.
Supermodels date online?
Get out there and try things. If you have an abundant mindset you are more likely to get out and have a go at things. It does not matter if you fail or are not the best, what matters is having a go and have fun while doing it.
Ahmed fully presents this traditional and religious society, including the usual repression of women and foreigners. With so much talk lately about female character agency and how historically-based fantasy settings show repressed women and minorities simply because that is how it was perceived to be in our own world, Ahmed shows how to walk the fine line and look good doing it. Through Zamia and the alchemist Litaz, Ahmed shows women both young and old who are well-rounded, interesting and strong. Along
I crossed the Finish Line, grabbed my medal and headed inside to get my post-race goodies: food, Blue Bell ice cream, my Cowtown Challenge medal and my Finisher's shirt (which I wasn't expecting at all). All in all, I loved this race. Everything about this race was great: the organization, the course, the swag, everything! I walked out of this Race Weekend 1 t-shirt, 2 tech tees and 2 medals...how sweet is that?
- Find temporary storage space for the BAPMAF archives so that at some point in the future these can become available again to myself and the general public.
Mashandan*
Moore also discovers he has a child - a daughter - one he has never known about. Isabel is the product of one of many affairs he's had, and when Isabel's mother dies from scarlet fever, Isabel is dropped off at Moore's house. He is, unsurprisingly, horrified.
Don't despair because you can order some of Cinnaholic's items online. At this point (remember, they are still a very new company and continuing to evolve), you can order a package of 12 cinnamon rolls with containers of "Old Skool" frosting ($50) and 10 of their frosting flavors for 50 cents a shot. Cinnaholic bakes and ships the rolls on Monday. They say you will receive them within 2-3 days (shipping is $15 per dozen rolls) but my order came the very next day! You just reheat them, put the frosting on top and eat 'em up or you can freeze the rest (if you can't eat all 12 in one sitting).
You will not be able to leave a comment on this post.
**He gets frustrated with me often, "Momma? Mommmma? Momma, are you wistening to me? Unfortunatewy, this is very important."
So, see you next Wednesday!
First let me start off by sharing my latest creative endevour , here she is
Intro
They will learn the way adults learn. Something will catch their interest, they will explore it until they are satisfied (for now), and then they'll move on. Later, they'll learn something else that reminds them of that thing they learned before, and they'll make a connection. "Oh, hey, that's like..."
By the late-90′s Grrl Power era she might have woken up, might have played out, found some expression and satisfaction but that didn’t happen. She sulked in her room. She raged against San Francisco, and she rejected the few chances that came her way. And instead of playing guitars she began collecting them.
Teachers unions were predictably opposed and even heavier-handed than usual. Michael Walker Jones of the Louisiana Association of Educators dismissed choice on grounds that “If I’m a parent in poverty I have no clue because I’m trying to struggle and live day to day.” Unions pushed principals to cancel school—sometimes giving parents less than 24 hours notice—so teachers could protest at the state Capitol. It was a tired act.
10. A Shot in the Dark (3:01)
Recently, I became hooked on the TV series Battlestar Galactica by watching it on Netflix. I never thought I would get this hooked on a TV show since The X-Files, but I did! The chemistry between the actors and the fact that most of the cast didn’t change throughout the four seasons helped with the bonding you receive from a TV show you just can’t get enough of.
Last but not least, I fell in love with this fretwork back ghost chair. Made in Italy they are stackable, thus easier to store. I imagined a set surrounding a round painted wood table in an eat-in kithcen. Hose them down when dirty makes them great for families with children. Not inexpensive at $395 each, but a winner in my book.
The CCF, is expected to be continued. The terms of the CCF would expected to be on the usual commercial basis. The objective for the CCF is for both airlines to synergise and to achieve the economies of scale, in preparation of the ASEAN Open Sky policy which comes to force in 2015. A lot of areas of mutual interest and benefit to both airlines, could be forged and worked together.
I can not stress this enough, if you are really want to get the best photo you can then you really need to invest your time in the show you are shooting. Get there early and I’m talking about 2-3 hours early, especially if your shooting a well-known event or designer. You would be amazed at how fast the media pit fills up, and me like most photographers will fight to keep their spot. When I attend fashion week I arrived 2 hours early to claim my sweet spot on the end of the runway.
Of all the bookstores I've ever been to (in NYC or otherwise), St. Mark's appears to carry more of "my kind" of books. On their hardcover fiction shelf, I oooh'd and aaah'd over almost ever novel I saw. No fluffy stuff showing their spines on those shelves, no sirree.
The term “neutralize” does not necessarily mean “eliminate” of “kill”, it can also refer to the employment of scare tactics. This brings me to the nagging question whether the ongoing murder of white farmers in South Africa is a scare tactic of the ANC government or not, and whether the murder of the Boer leader Eugène Terre'Blanche, the relentless raids on private homes to seize unlicensed firearms, the recent fiasco at the VVK gathering at Paardekraal, the closure of the renowned and controversial SA Sucks blog, etc… is part-and-parcel of the government’s attempt to neutralize ‘hostile’ elements, or not?!?
Step 3: trace it right from the computer screen and cut it out.
...at our place? Lots as always, but here are just a couple of highlights.
Do you have an Old Mall in your town? As those caverns of the 70′s stubbornly rust all over the country, they evolve into one of a number of morphologies: there’s the Ghost Mall, that has maybe one store still there and the others look haunted and Cormac McCarthy-ish. The giant letters forming the names of the stores have been removed and left their traces on the wall. Best “out of business” sign there is.
The minute I stopped the player, my mind flashed back to the energy clearing with the little girl on Saturday. The steps I had used from the book’s instructions, the instinctive additions, and ad libs I used to get such an easy profound change. Suddenly I felt a bigger picture, I saw the hook, tease, bait of almost all of what was being offered up front. Minus the finale, albeit maybe not intentionally, except I have listened and done enough self-help things to always fall just short of the miraculous finish I was expecting.
let ourselves be carried away and move along with the rest
You ever notice when you really need someone you can depend on…someone who you know will come through no matter what, it is the busiest person. The person who on the surface seems like there is no way in the world they can handle one more thing. You know why? Because the idle ones have too many excuses…to many substitutes…too many shortcuts. Almost everything in life is that way. Unfortunately most of us will never know our true capacity for achievement because we never challenge ourselves to perform at our best every day. This is most obvious when we are presented with an opportunity that really interests us. No matter how busy we are, when there is something we want to do…something we like to do, somehow we will find the time to pursue it…right? On the other hand, those things that we don’t like or those things we don’t want to do are easily postponed and eventually forgotten. Successful people are not procrastinators…the most successful and effective people have a sense of urgency. They just grab a hold of it and get it done!!!! They set deadlines and force themselves to establish priorities by what is most important and not by what they like to do the most. Deadlines….that is the magic word. Unfortunately, way too many people never set a deadline to accomplish those things which are most important. They put it on the proverbial “list”. You know “the list” I am talking about. The one you write crap down on that you never have any intention on doing. Because those things we don’t put on “the list”, we usually just dive in and get done…usually before the deadline…right? Remember, we are not naturally wound to do all the things we need to do to be successful in life…personally, professionally…health…etc. Because usually those things required to be successful at any area in life, involve doing something we don’t naturally like to do…at least not in the beginning. Otherwise everyone would be getting everything they want in life…right? Here are a few examples…
Sickening slums of heavens grace
And here, in the comfort of your own browser, is your free sample:
Like Adam, our first conspicuous ancestor, I must begin, and lay the blame upon a woman; I am glad to recognize that I differ from the father of my sex in no important particular, being as manlike as most of his sons. Therefore it is the woman, my Aunt Carola, who must bear the whole reproach of the folly which I shall forthwith confess to you, since she it was who put it into my head; and, as it was only to make Eve happy that her husband ever consented to eat the disastrous apple, so I, save to please my relative, had never aspired to become a Selected Salic Scion. I rejoice now that I did so, that I yielded to her temptation. Ours is a wide country, and most of us know but our own corner of it, while, thanks to my Aunt, I have been able to add another corner. This, among many other enlightenments of navel and education, do I owe her; she stands on the threshold of all that is to come; therefore I were lacking in deference did I pass her and her Scions by without due mention,—employing no English but such as fits a theme so stately. Although she never left the threshold, nor went to Kings Port with me, nor saw the boy, or the girl, or any part of what befell them, she knew quite well who the boy was. When I wrote her about him, she remembered one of his grandmothers whom she had visited during her own girlhood, long before the war, both in Kings Port and at the family plantation; and this old memory led her to express a kindly interest in him. How odd and far away that interest seems, now that it has been turned to cold displeasure!
-small handful fresh tarragon leaves
The remainder of our time at the lodge we relaxed and enjoyed the environment. It’s hard to beat sitting on a deck with an ocean view drinking crappy boxed wine and watching a troop of monkeys swing by in the trees.
And the winner was ... Catherine Cooper!
The authorities can not face it when they do plant a bomb and ask their neighbours leading questions then pretend how much they had integrated and how he loved fish and chips. They gather endless statistics on the widespread support for terrorism then ignore them because they can’t face it.
Christmas Day, the kids woke up to find tons of presents left by Santa and Mom & Dad. It was a blast watching them! Noah kept saying "I've been waiting for this!". Mid-morning, we left for Canton to go to my in-laws. We had a nice lunch and visit with everyone. By 3:30 or so, we had to get on the road to get to my aunt and uncle's in East Peoria. Unfortunately, that was the time most people were leaving. But the kids got to play a few games on my aunt's new Wii :) The highlight of my night was going to Peoria to visit with my sister Jessica and her family! They were in town from Kansas...I haven't gotten to see them since Thanksiving of 2007! It was a short visit but the kids held up great!
Butz did this to free up the American economy – the price of food went WAY down. Prior to this, the average home was spending half of its income on food, now they were paying around 16%. This was huge. Corn actually costs less today than it did in 1950. Yippee!
My previous blog article, part 2 last week, began with a mouse on the bike saddle. A few days after the post was released on the blog, I received a few more photos on more outdoor bike art.
And the reason for this staggering crafty treasure. Jodie has asked me to be on her unofficial design team lol. Yup, we've agreed to have a laid-back, stress-free arrangement. The Papercrafting Mafia won't be knocking on my door demanding the latest instalment of cards and scrapbooks, or threatening me with the promise of waking up to something nasty on my pillow lol.
I asked if she knew what the deal with CALWORKS is. She says that if I keep my daughter on cash aid (even though my time clock has expired, she still receives $345 in aid, plus food stamps and medical), that I would collect an additional $50 from the child support payments and the rest would "pay back" my welfare. So I would collect $395 per month and it would be called, "aid". And I would have to keep jumping the hoops. Or, I could take my daughter off of aid and collect the child support directly. My question is, if I take us off aid, then will they still claim the back child support? If not, then I would receive $414 per month. If they do, I will only get $345. However, my x could lose his job or go back to getting paid under the table and then this will be a non-issue.
It was our latest observance yet, but between commitments and vacations, this was the first opportunity.
Maybe she’d just meow.
Add the broccoli and cook for 10 minutes or until tender. Reduce the heat and let the soup cool slightly.
Am glad you replied back i still have my life and passport because it would have been worst if they made away with my passport.I have reported to the Police and have also contacted the Embassy but am afraid at this time there is noting they can do.well all I need is just $1,980 and you can have it wired to me via Western Union MoneyTransfer from any nearby western union outlet. Here's my info below
I like writing and publishing books. My own, of course, but it is also incredibly rewarding to have a hand in seeing other writers' dreams of publication come true. I love it love it love it. Having a career in publishing is the best job I could ask for.
Wha? You were thrown into this war thingy that I don’t understand and you were told to carry some bridge all across the Shattered Plains and your shoulders are bleeding and your feet are bleeding and you weren’t given any vests or shoes because that damned Gaz guy doesn’t like you? HOW HORRIBLE! You poor baby!
Well its taken me all week to start this post and a few bloggy friends have asked how Louise's party went so though I had better get moving. It ended up being quite an event and once again there never seems enough time to take any decent photos so this is the best of the lot.
So the hiring process commences again. Hopefully it won't take 3 months to get him replaced as it did with the "Worthless Co-Worker." I'm not holding my breath though as it always takes an ungodly amount of time to get people hired here. The one thing I do know is that the boss will be thrust into panic mode about this. March isn't a good month to be short handed for us as we do a couple of off-site sales events in addition to having a store to staff. Compounding this is his wife is pregnant and due in late March as well. He had planned to take one week of vacation when the baby arrived which probably isn't feasible now.
Now pretty quickly I snapped back to Jesus and I know that all of the above is far from the truth.
So went an interesting year in the women’s deuce. Next I’ll take a look at the men and women’s 400.
When Chidziva was still at the vaRozvi chief’s village there came some traders from Portuguese East Africa who were selling beads, clothes and other things. Chidziva bought a hat which was surrounded by a band of shining white shells. When Chidziva went to his country of Chishawasha the chief of the vaRozvi said to Chidziva, “Go in peace. When your chief dies don’t come to me but do what you have been doing.” When he reached Chishawasha he first went to the hill Chishawasha with his drummers beating the drums and calling the people to come and greet the chief. All the people came and greeted the chief and killed many cattle and they cooked plenty of food. Chidziva stood up and called Chinamaringa his elder brother and put the hat on his head. He said to the people, ‘Chinamaringa is now our chief Chinamora from today because I can not be a chief while Chinamaringa my big brother is still alive.”
Finally, after many stops, starts, and ‘tuts’ from said driver, we arrived at Ratchetewi around 2pm. A full hour and a half late. Now I was wishing I had never set those pissing alarms. The karma was crashing down around my ears. So we got out at the BTS, crossed the bridge and descended on the street in front of the Rock Pub. Were we greeted by the sounds of raucous metal, blaring out of the hell gates, the place deserted because all the feverish metallers were inside going crazy?
One of the key musical moments of this third movie incarnation of Star Trek, restored to the soundtrack in the recent expanded soundtrack release from Film Score Monthly. Horner skilfully blends the action with the emotional implications of what’s happening to the iconic Enterprise.
What date activities do you like? Playing games with friends? A good old-fashioned dinner + movie? I'd love to hear suggestions!! xoxo
On the other hand, I think one of the reasons the Reldas in our lives are allowed to exist is they give us an inkling of what the slightest, faintest thread in the tapestry of God’s love must look like.
So you get a few shots, pack up your gear, wash your tripod in fresh water and then download your images to the Mac only to find…….lets see, umm mediocre at best. This seascape thing, whilst still not my passion, is no doddle. You cannot just take a point and shoot to a pretty location and bingo, have a hangable masterpiece, no this genre takes practice, dedication and perhaps a degree of insomnia. One of the masters of this art form here in Queensland , William from Liquid Boulevard, said to me only two days ago,” If you’re not on the beach by 3.45am, your too late”, OMG !!
Other than that there's not a lot happening in either the writing or the real world.
Reaching for his whiskey, wishing to fly,
diminuitive too, says the strength of her bones
On Saturday night, Londoners attempting to travel home were abandoned by night buses which failed to adjust their timetables to the clocks going back. With London tube services ending around midnight, thousands of Londoners depend upon a timetabled night bus service to take them home.
Please remember that these are just snippets of the full card and if you click on each it will take you to the original post and you will be able to see the whole card with all the details and you can even leave a kind comment for the creator!
My goal is to share my experiences and hopefully people will feel the same fullness and learn from the mistakes I’ve made.
Today's piece of sheer hokum comes from the world's cheesiest pop star, the inimitable Jess Conrad, with the flip side of his 1961 release This Pullover - an all-time classic bad record Why Am I Living?
those long lines
03 - Fate
And inhale deeply in good conscience, just to set a mood
So, putting pen to paper my manuscripts began to take on life and my journey of grief began. I started to feel something I had not felt in years and it encouraged me to continue on. The words and story flowed with undeniable strength and Kristi’s presence filled the room as I wrote. So intense was the soul of my story and the characters breaking through that one of them actually captured the essence of my sister, pulling her into my manuscript where she then came alive as Crystia, a player, in my ongoing trilogy.
Jami: Tate was so young I think all he knew was that Mommy was unhappy. We still talk about his brother or sister in Heaven. He wishes he had siblings... mostly someone to play with. That aspect has been the hardest for Jim and I. We've always wanted Tate to have brothers and sisters. Seeing him alone so much is a constant reminder of what he's missing out on. It's even harder to look to the future and see him alone then, too. We love getting together with our siblings over the holidays, and Tate will never have that. It breaks our hearts.
Welcome to the Sketch It To Me June Blog Hop. You should have come from Ashley's blog and will head to Mandi's when you are done here. Thanks for stopping by and checking out my work. I will admit, this is my first time participating in a blog hop but I've had so much fun "attending" them in the past, that I wanted to give it a try. I hope you find a little inspiration from what you see here.
It is not always easy to devote time for your spouse, Pastor Young admitted. Just three days into the sex challenge he said he was so tired after getting up before dawn to talk about the importance of having more sex in marriage that he crashed on the bed around 8 p.m. on Tuesday night.
This is a speech that I gave last year at the annual Northern Ireland Bureau Lunch for the Washington Ireland Program Class. The speech considers the relationship between Northern Ireland and Ireland, and looks to the European Union for inspiration on where North-South relations should be going. It was our first week in Washington DC, and at that point I knew very little about Northern Irish society and politics. Looking back at this speech a year on, I find that I agree with a lot of it. I managed to deduce at that point, pretty much from first principles, some ideas and beliefs on Northern Ireland that became more nuanced over the summer. However, I do think the tone verges on becoming slightly presumptuous at times.
With Pinterest, one 'pins' a photo on one's Pinterest page, however, Pinterest stores this image and, like Facebook, can store, or sell the image with no credit for s/he who created it.
Well, the sci-fi gods were definitely smiling down on my brother when they handed him a girl named “Troi.” And yo- I mean SHE is as awesome as her name. Plus, she gave me an adorable nephew to dote on and warp into a mini nerd. I’m super lucky in that my whole family is super cool and super supportive.
It's my comfort
However, while it took me several months, I did finally complete a Triple Threads Unity three card set depicting Citi Field in the background. I'm not sure why the Triple Threads Unity "gimmick" sparked my interest, but it did. Anyone else get dragged into completing a unity of their own?
work the rest of the stitches into the back loop only of the previous row.
On the other hand, the realities of African-American history, of Jewish history, of the minority experience, mean that the two sides are weighted and freighted unequally. One mother of biracial black/white children told me, “I have always been crystal clear with my kids: you are black.” Many interfaith families choose Judaism for their children, for similar reasons. Be proud and stand with your people, others are going to identify you as black (Jewish) anyway, do not try to “pass.”
Ft. Bliss (El Paso) – Extensive renovation of buildings and from what patriots have been able to see, many of these buildings that are being renovated are being surrounded by razor wire.
4-6 slices of thick toast (we used French whole wheat)
We highly recommend the Happy Napper and they have a variety of animals to choose from. They are normally priced at $19.99, but right now they are on sale for $14.99 which is an awesome price! As a special treat, you can use the code: SPECIAL4U to receive FREE shipping! Not only is this a great price, but a portion of all Happy Nappers' proceeds will be given to the Home Sweet Home Fund benefiting the Children's Brain Tumor Foundation. That makes this not only a great deal, but also a great company. So be sure you don't miss out and order yours today!
Shep Fields Orchestra--Harbor Lights
Math -- 30 - 45 minutes
"Well, we can't blame ourselves. I mean, we had no idea that they were going to be staying at our hotel. We just cannot blame ourselves," PeyPey said. "I know. I wish drunk Jeannie would've made a different decision last night in the cab. I seriously can't believe this," Jeannie said. "We can't let this ruin the memory of the great time we had last night," said PeyPey. "Agreed. But it still sucks. Maybe it was God's protection. We would've both ended up doing things we would've regretted with some roofies." replied Jeannie. (Kidding.)
In the altar for a stage
I highly recommend visiting when you are in Barcelona. I will try to post more photos along my trip but have mostly been tying to relax and enjoy the amazing sights and foods.
A: Exactly. There is no such thing as true atheism. You cannot prove nor disprove God completely. The only logical “non-belief” is agnosticism.
3 large eggs, at room temp
3. Heat oil in a frying pan and put the chicken legs on hot oil. Fry them by turning them occasionally until the color become golden brown. Bring the fried chicken on a plate.
( I wonder what I am missing to see that I can appreciate.)
Taking the time to get away is healthy. Too often in my life I haven’t really done this. I’ve been guilty of trying to put four days of relaxation into two days and although it has been good, it wasn’t what it could have been.
You both decided to let go. That hug seemed like it could’ve lasted until time ended. You stayed with Raivis until sundown, cuddling together. He gave you one last kiss on the cheek before you adventured outside into the freezing temperatures.
During a parliamentary session this week, it was revealed that the Singapore government spends some $36 million dollars on scholarships to over two thousand students each year, or about S$174,00 per scholar.
Several Sundays ago, (on Palm Sunday to be exact), I decided to take a few pictures of the “new me.” Well maybe not the new me, but the lessened me. I realized I hadn’t taken any full body pictures of myself for awhile, so that Sunday, I decided to set up the camera and take a few.
Matthews went on to replace Pee Wee Ellis (who also went onto to work at CTI) as Brown's arranger and musical director until 1975. During this time, Matthews also arranged albums for Buddy Rich, Mark Murphy, O'Donell Levy, Blue Mitchell and David Sanborn.
I recently gave a talk at a fundraising event at Barnes and Noble in Nashua supporting the Friends of the Nashua Public Library. The talk was called:
12--(13:31)--- I Love You jam for Jimi (2&1/2 weeks gone)
A. Symptote
Such a precarious balance.
This does not mean acceptance of a grossly unequal society but this is an argument for another day: http://colummccaffery.wordpress.com/2011/12/01/irish-sovereignty-may-be-reduced-but-the-power-to-prioritise-remains/
Source: MY AUDIENCE MASTER (MASTER)
We have a lot of basil in our garden, somehow this year I've managed to grow more of it than I normally use (there seems to be forever a jar of pesto in the fridge!), which just means that I've become a bit more creative in how I use it, or (most of the time) just throw it into dishes more often. It added an extra dimension to a stir fry of thinly sliced kangaroo (marinated briefly in soy, sambal oelek and garlic), mushrooms, a red pepper from the garden and jasmine rice - its stronger aniseed notes went really well with the asian flavours in the wok. It was such a simple delicious dinner, I'm no longer bound by Italian cooking when thinking of how to use my basil! I have purple basil as well, but tend to use the green basil more often purely because I have more of it, it's thrived where the purple basil has been much more subdued (though its a very pretty addition to any garden!).
5. Eliminate all provincial tax subsidies to business, including the entertainment industry.
On to floofy Friday!
3. We have been getting ONE GALLON of milk each day from our lovely lady.
Isocrates, To Demonicus 1.1 In many respects, Demonicus, we shall find that much disparity exists between the principles of good men and the notions of the base; but most of all by far have they parted company in the quality of their friendships. The base honor their friends only when they are present; the good cherish theirs even when they are far away; and while it takes only a short time to break up the intimacies of the base, not all eternity can blot out the friendships of good men.
BLITZER: …you said the U.S. should talk to everyone. Imagine you’re in the Oval Office, you speak to Raul Castro. What would you say to him?
A dear friend of mine once blogged about “good envy” – is there such thing? I mean, can we associate envy with a positive adjective, even if it’s to show admiration for someone/something?
19- Lontano da 4.24
"Afternoon, Johnny!" said the preacher. "I see you have the staff of life in one hand; what do you have in the other?"
19 have been accused of writing bad cheques
Happy post-Thanksgiving to all. I hope everyone had a wonderful holiday celebration. I was still enjoying the leftovers on Saturday, but decided to call it quits when I ran out of my broccoli cheese casserole. My hand is healing nicely after a knife wound I accidently inflicted on myself while trying to remove the foil from the top of a wine bottle. Note to self: In the future, use a foil cutter thingie or just skip this step altogether. It's always something....at least I got out of dish duty.
Here is a proactive way of bringing jobs back to the UK. Do the following when you phone any customer service operation that is based in a foreign country.
Through the next 6 weeks this show will evolve and change daily as new ideas form on the blank canvases, colours appear on the "sketched ones" and the purchased finished ones will leave to make space for new blank canvases.
This office space for multiple people has two features in it that I think are critical… a hard floor and lots of counter space. The color scheme of lime and tangerine give this space life. The only thing missing for me is natural lighting.
I have been using this recipe for about 10 years. I first discovered it in an old cookbook that featured recipes that used brand names. It intrigued me because it used very little ingredients but were absolutely delicious, moist and perfect every time I made them. They even make a great regular peanut butter cookie and I like to add Peanut Butter chips to them, you can even add semi sweet chocolate chips as well and do the criss cross shape on top of them.
I have one other Leisure Arts crochet book and they are basically how I taught myself to crochet when I was in college. The back of each book has detailed pictures explaining each stitch which made it super easy to teach myself.
The point of the battle was not about "massacring" or "defeating" or conquering the proud Zulu nation. Because the Boers would have defended themselves in exactly the same way if they were being attacked by the British / German or Spanish power. Furthermore: the Boers allowed the Zulus to govern themselves in Zululand after the battle & entered into an alliance with the new Zulu King Mpande for quite some time afterwards. The Zulus were not conquered until the British came & conquered them in 1879. Long after the establishment of the major Boer Republics.
To make productive use of his time Doug decided to join swimming and basketball leagues for disabled kids.
Heat the whipping cream in a small saucepan on medium low until bubbles begin to form around the edge of the pan. Remove from the heat and add the chocolate. Stir until the mixture is smooth and then let stand for 10 minutes. Pour over the cheesecake and let the ganache drip over the sides for an even smooth coating. Sprinkle with roasted pecans and let chill for at least 1 hour.
I didn’t (and still don’t) care much about styling. This is how it looked back in the day:
In the magazine, he gloated of spending much of his retirement traveling abroad. That must be the 10% ticket fare.
HE WAS ALWAYS THERE.
What would you ask them?
In so many words Paul would say to Christ, “They will believe me for I relate to them.” No he doesn’t He was the chief persecutor but now he is a new creature in Christ. Reading from 2 Corinthians 5:17, “Old things are passed away, behold all things are become new.” If he relates to them in their sinful state he is not serving the Lord but the Evil one.
The deal for the idled 185,000 barrel per day Trainer, Pa., refinery, which has puzzled analysts since it first surfaced last month, will come as some relief to politicians and officials, who had feared thousands of lost jobs and a potential summer spike in fuel costs if the plant was shut permanently.
"How do we know Jesus was Jewish?
When I saw that this book included the recipe Shrimp Creole, I knew I’d have to cook it. Recently, the boyfriend and I went to Florida, and while there we took a trip with some friends to St Augustine, a beautiful coastal town which is also the oldest in the States. This town is crammed with great restaurants, but the one we fell in love with was Harrys Seafood restaurant. I cannot recommend this place enough, the food was amazing, cocktails boozy and atmosphere was one of a kind. We sat in the garden, fairy lights twinkling around the palm trees and a musician playing in the background. For starters the four of us shared fried green tomatoes (way better than I expected) and voodoo shrimp. This shrimp recipe I have been trying to replicate ever since getting back, but it has been impossible, which is a shame as they were the best thing I ate all holiday. The rest of the meal was still stunning (stuffed shrimp, scallops and crab encrusted fish with grit cakes), but nothing topped those shrimp. I was really hoping that this recipe would come close, but sadly no luck. It was a really nice meal though, which I would definitely make again. For a start, any recipe that says to cook the diced veg in bacon drippings is going to be good, surely? The sauce was sweet but spicy, with the occasional salty smoky crunch from the crumbled bacon. I could only get hold of little prawns this week, I think next time I make it I’ll use king prawns so it adds more substance to the meal as the little prawns disappeared amongst the sauce.
I bet you would never have expected a countdown to Christmas today!
And I understand his meaning
Another point I explore below is that the association between love of individual liberty and pragmatism is no accident. The two attitudes are in fact related.
to decorate for the upcoming holiday.
That is without question how those young British soldiers who fought for their country and those young Australians who fought for the mother country in the World Wars would see what is happening. It is a mercy they could not see the future and did not know that their deaths may well have been in vain, or that their counties, for Australia is doing the same, would one day betray them.
What do you think of these stories? Share your thoughts in the comments section, or send them to me by eMail.
If we ever had time to check our Sitemeter, we could find out things like your computer's IP (internet protocol) address, your ISP (internet service provider, such as AOL or Shaw Cable), the browser you used to visit our site (such as Internet Explorer or Firefox), the time you visited our site and which pages you visited throughout our site. But not your name, address or other personally identifying information.
And two tips for you before I go:
I really had to rack my brain for some of these... I don't really remember much about my childhood - what is that they say? You block out the bad memories? My parents split up and eventually divorced when I was 7-9 --- and then it was step mother, step father, step brothers and one half brother.... (Yup... all boys!)
He asked me once, "Am I whistling in the dark?"
Welcome, old (and new) friends! I’m sure some of you remember my old blog “A Touch of Garlic.” At the end of last summer, I dropped off the face of the Earth between balancing a new job and consulting part-time for my old one, and moving. Then at the end of December when I could actually breathe again – bye, bye old job for good – and I decided 2012 would be my year, I wanted to give this blogging thing another shot since many of my friends said they missed it, or at least missed the easy access to my recipes! But it just didn’t feel right writing on the old blog – so much has changed in my life in the two years since I started it. So, I bombed the old and it’s taken me this long to get my act together. What can I say, I’ve been busy?
I think I can say with a fair degree of certainty, from my experience as a doctor in one of the areas in which a police station has just been burned down, that half of those rioting would reply to the question, “Can you do arithmetic?” by answering, “What is arithmetic?”
You gotta face the clouds
I’ve waited till an appropriate time-i.e. after Christmas, to review Brewdog’s most controversial beer to date. Now as every Marx Bros fan knows, there is no sanity clause, but Brewdog may have risked the ire of parents up and down the land with the title of this beer. Imagine your nine year old pops down the offy to stock up for his big night in with the lads and comes across this. You could be paying for their therapy for years.
Cake -- me & Betty Crocker
And we try to live up to that. We are a group of fairly active activists and a network of like-minded coalition allies who joined together in late 2010 to advocate for local civil rights initiatives ranging from opposing Metro bag searches and advocating for a civil rights restoration act for the county to supporting youth curfew opponents, yet also opposing the worse alternative of a broadly drawn county loitering bill.
Then there is the wind: this is a landscape windswept like no other I have known. To the east and north, nothing rises by more than a few dozen feet above sea level between here and the steppes of Siberia, and you can tell. Walking in one direction the going may be easy, the sun warm on your face, but turn back and the breath is knocked out of you in an instant; blinded by tears, you’re forced to lean into the blast like Amundsen nearing the Pole.
Mary Katherine Boffa, 45, New York, N.Y.
For this project I used Steampunk papers, tickets, Bingo cards, Digis and just a couple of extra bits from my stash-a 'Happy Birthday' peel off and some buttons I recycled from an old top.
The best part of the trip was being able to go to hang out with soccer fans from around the world. It was a soccer geek paradise.
While we remodel our house, we're living in a tiny city apartment with a rooftop garden. The garden has some beautiful blooming shrubs. They are really lovely right now and inspired me to create this simple spring garland.
29 Geiom - Safety Patterns
Every time we get in the car she grabs an armful of her friends to come with - this is the usual crowd - Baba, Woof Woof and Baby
1) The marketplace is the driving force behind everything that we do.
He was getting old and paunchy, and his hair was falling fast; and he sat around the post home, telling stories of the past.
It is beautiful here in Kentucky! ‘Silver White Winter’ has turned into Spring! There really were few ‘wintery’ days…but those few days were definitely beautiful…and a nice change from the Arizona desert scenery!
When the boys woke up that morning about 7:30, I couldn't even get out of bed. I felt worse than I've ever felt. Poor Greg had been up all night cleaning up and helping me and Carter and then he started to feel bad, but since I couldn't get out of bed, he got up with the boys. He ended up calling someone to come over and stay with the boys since I wasn't able to help and he was feeling worse and worse. She kept the boys from about 11-2 in the basement so we could sleep. I honestly don't know what we would have done without her help. When she left, I went downstairs to see if I could help with the boys, but was feeling so awful. My doctor called me in something for the nausea, so we decided to go to Target. I drove there and Greg ran in while I stayed in the car with the boys. Just sitting in the car was more than I could handle and Greg had to drive back. We were in bad shape. We made it through the rest of the afternoon and put the boys to bed early. I slept on the couch while Greg watched some tv and then we went to bed about 7:30.
I’ll do what is necessary to eradicate this problem.
But this complex and troubling history of Powell’s time in Vietnam is routinely white-washed by Washington journalists who uniformly treat Powell with the respect owed a genuine war hero. The U.S. news media’s fawning over Colin Powell also has not been a victimless exercise.
I reminded the man a few times about preparing the taxi but he still failed to try to get it ready, and so I told him to keep the money; and that I would just drive Mrs. Murphy and me/I in my automobile instead.
“The work stands on its own, but when you engage the work with the historical material we put out with it, there is a depth there that we’ve just been enchanted by,” Schwartz said.
GHOSTLY VOICE: Sheeeeee caaaaaaan’t heeeeeear youuuuuuu, Baraaaaaaaaack!
I'm not a politician. I am someone who believes, like most Americans, that something is drastically wrong with Congress and our country’s political system, a system where multi-national corporations and the wealthiest control too many of our elected representatives like Congressman Cantor.
When he applied himself to it, he could be an excellent teacher. He encouraged my interest in history and tried to instil in us a sense of the importance of politics and debate. It was a classroom in which debate was frequent; given his lack of fundamental authority, those of us with rhetorical ability could engage him in endless discussions, or encourage him to hold forth on themes which interested him. But, more often than not, he was listless and unmotivated and frequently avoided teaching subjects, like the Irish which (following the official national ethos of independent Ireland should one day resume its long-lost position as first language of the country) was compulsory and generally hated by a majority of the pupils. Thomas Mooney spoke fluent Irish himself, but seemed to find the effort of pounding it into our thick reluctant skulls too much. Our lack of progress here would cause a number of my fellow pupils serious problems later on (Irish remained compulsory as a major subject right up to the end of secondary school), but, fortunately for me, my parents spotted my deficits pretty quickly and arranged for me to get extra tuition outside school.
The jurisdiction covers private sector employers but does not include self employed, family farm workers and those employed by the government. The OSHA inspections are conducted without advance notice and on site. In some cases it is even done through fax and telephones. The OSHA inspectors will provide you with identification and the reason why they are inspecting your facility. In most cases there are no notices provided. Most of them are necessitated because of injuries, complaints or as a part of routine visit.
EDITOR: Usual.
Now for my second problem batch. Same story as above. My American Stout started fermention unusually slow and formed and dropped its krausen within the first thirty-six hours. The yeast is wy1272 American Ale II, which has always formed a very thick and fluffy krausen that sticks around forever. I took the carboy out of the fermentation chest to let it ferment at ambient temps (65-68F) in the hopes it might make a difference.
People think it’s so awesome to have big boobs. Women get implants and men try to convince their women it’s a good idea to do so. Well I’m going to set this record straight now. It’s really not what it’s cracked up to be. There is really more negatives than there are positives to having a big chest. Take it from someone who isn’t exactly small in that department, if you catch my drift.
Across town, another group gathered for what the Geneva Human Rights Commission promoted as a positive alternative to Atzmon’s performance: A showing of the award-winning documentary “The Anatomy of Hate” at Hobart and William Smith Colleges.
Update: I've nearly finished editing with two of my Alpha readers. Their feedback has been amazing. Both of them loved it and said they had to do mostly line edits because it doesn't really need content edits.
Enjoy meditating for its own sake.
Blair
default code when the system is not enabled for a vehicle, created a patch to
We stop. In front of us are tall wooden stilts webbed together and meet one another with red, rested bolts.
And at three a.m. he tucked himself into bed
There's no doubt at all France produces a stunning array of foodstuffs - and its cuisine has contributed more than it's fair share to the global melting pot of national gastronomies. But the next time a French person makes a snide comment at eating habits in your home country, remind them that 'la pepperoni et cheese' is fast becoming the French national dish.
HAHAHAHA!
Nordstrom BP Vneck
These see the works of the LORD, and his wonders in the deep.
2 managers
1/2 cup crushed ice (cold water is fine)
Susanne M. Glover, OHIO,USA
My favorite character in the movie was The Kid. He was awesome. Impeccably dressed, humorous, and a helpful sidekick. Think suspenders, knickers and newsboy caps all in the same deliciously bold colors seen in the clip above. I'd post some pictures here, but it seems that despite the movies fabulous visuals, which is really it's strongpoint, there arn't too many pictures or even video to be found. But, it appears you can find some of the old Dick Tracy series on youtube.
Tasks that need constant attention, such as typing recipes, or de-cluttering the kitchen bench, are best done regularly. If you set aside an appropriate amount of time to keep on top of the task (2 hrs per month, 5 mins per day; whatever it might be) small tasks wont get the chance to grow into big, overwhelming jobs. A little effort regularly will help keep things in order long-term.
Well, my second last post was about how a sudden visit to the local national park can throw a good photography opportunity. Dear first timers here’s the link for that post in case you are confused.
*Deluxe soft goods on a unique frame
Matthew 13:14-16 (NLT)
These lies were of course repeated, and indeed embellished by, the enemies of our country and left wing extremist IRA supporters at Searchlight, Hope not Hate and old favourite, the intellectually challenged, Sunday World.
2 cups Gluten Free Pancake/Waffle Mix (I used King Arthur brand)
The Washington Post’s Rachel Manteuffel explained the issue first and more clearly than anyone by doing what anyone with a brain should have done. First she applied her critical reasoning to the text itself. To begin with, it made King look stupid and verbally clumsy. Both the subject and the tone stood in jarring contrast to his famous biblically inspired sermons and speeches: “To me, silly hats and King just did not compute.” Worse still, it made him look shallow and self-centered: “akin to memorializing Mahatma Gandhi with the quote, ‘Don’t you know who I am?’” She was puzzled and taken aback.
Hopefully, you'll see me either midweek or at the end of this upcoming week. Till then, thank you to everyone who has dropped by in the midst of my "But I can't comment on anything!" crisis and those who have found me through the A - Z Challenge.
Bharti Airtel on Tuesday become the first company in India to offer high speed internet services using fourth-generation (4G) telecommunications technology.
Biblical.
“I just saw my mom get off the elevator.”
Frankly, he sounds a little drunk most of the time. In a bad way. On rare occasion, he starts slipping into what I can only describe as a more on pitch version of Sid Vicious' version of "My Way". I was dumbstruck and still can't believe some of the favorable reviews. Cause I'm here to tell you it's crap. It wasn't all just suicide inducing. It slipped into varying degrees of boring, played out and just forgettable. There was nothing the least bit interesting about this project. Also, whoever did the orchestra arrangement needs a boot up the ass. They did this no favors at all….. my personal favorite moments were the strange island calypso/steel drum inspired moments. Again, WTF?
10. Searching With My Good Eye Closed
And that's when I knew I had solved my freezer problem. And when I ordered online and put in my 20% off coupon code, they were even cheaper, and when I picked them up in store when I was out shopping with my bff, I didn't pay shipping.
I’ve had a few people ask me for the homemade bread recipe that I used. I never realized how EASY making homemade bread was!! Time consuming, but easy. This recipe made one loaf for now and one to freeze for later. So I’m hoping to do a huge bread making day soon and so I can stock my freezer of bread. Then I won’t have to make it every week. But there’s something very satisfying to me about making your own bread, and I really found it fun! I actually JUMPED up and down (kind of high in the air, actually haha) when my bread came out looking and tasting perfect. I usually ruin stuff in the kitchen. So the fact that this bread is amazing is PROOF that anyone CAN do it. It just takes time, discipline and a DESIRE to actually do it.
Not that I think I’m a great leader, I don’t know what I’m doing half of the time, or more than. I usually just sort of wing it and see how it works out. Haha. (:
Good luck to us all! ;-)
As interesting as it may be to be a part of this, I'm going to have to set a personal rule that if I have to push the little "new word" button more than once, I will not be commenting on that blog. There have been a few occasions where I had to keep pushing it because every word that came along was illegible. This can be a great frustration, and can lose you readers in the long run. You may want to consider turning it off, especially during high traffic times (such as April if you're participating in the A-to-Z Challenge). I've gone ahead and disabled mine to save others the frustration. The sound playback is often not any better. I can tell you that I am getting notified of spam, but Blogger is automatically catching any anonymous comments, which is the only form it's come in, so far. So I get the email about the spam, but when I check the actual post, the spam has not been posted, nor is it waiting in my dashboard for me.
Knowledge is power and for too long our children have been denied the knowledge that has made ours a powerful nation. America was, and must be again, a government of the people, not of the rich. Our aspirations must not be toward becoming one of the 1%. We must aspire to empower the 99% so that we will not fail in our responsibility to maintain the rights and freedoms guaranteed us by the Constitution of these United States.
The wail
The Who wrote dozens of great songs, but "I Can See For Miles" is clearly their greatest accomplishment. I don't have the same high opinion of the Byrds' overall body of work -- they were certainly not one-hit wonders, but "Eight Miles High" is so much better than anything else they did that's it's almost shocking.
Needless to say, it can make coming up with fun, interesting and filling recipes quite a challenge.
VideoDaily Roundup::Digital Video Still a Drop in TV’s Bucket : Today’s VideoDaily Roundup starts with… bit.ly/Jrk0E8
July 5 Perfect Pages 7pm-9pm
Some observations at RT:
The prize is a free voucher from Rudi's Bakery and a lunch box.
Unlike his early seventies' American contemporaries, who were guilelessly attempting to pick up where the French New Wave left off, Bogdanovich channels the workmanlike simplicity of John Ford and Howard Hawks in his compositional palette and lugubrious pacing (even paying explicit tribute to Hawks by using the final clip from Red River as the last flickers in the local cinema). The Last Picture Show, among the minority of the period as an American studio release voluntarily shot in black-and-white, is mostly comprised of melancholy establishing shots and familiar deep-focus conversational setups. Its narrative is revealed in fragments as Bogdanovich vacillates between different stories within the town, with pensive dialogue and sexual activity always overshadowing key dramatic epiphanies such as the death of Sam the Lion, Sonny and Duane's trip to Mexico, or (the final blow to the head) the tragic death of Sonny's childhood friend Billy (Sam Bottoms) when he is struck by a getaway car in the middle of the barren street.
In between games we bathed in the sunshine, admired the stunning snow vistas, passed cutting remarks about the other teams, munched on snacks and fawned over Biscuit, the cutest St Bernard dog you’ve ever seen. I, meanwhile, feeling the distinct lack of male connectivity became more and more preoccupied with matters Premiership and mooched back and forth to Martin and Ali (who came prepared with a flash of Jameson!) speculating on the Arsenal / Chelsea game which, apparently was a bore at 0 – 0. There was nothing boring about our time at Gornergrat which included a hearty fondue lunch served with hot tea and very palatable white wine. Our nearly-all-female-team then prepared for another assault, this time on Pascal who had the answers to the 2 questions which remained blank in our booklet. Darlene rallied the troops thus – “OK, girls, smile with your eyes and stick out your chests”. Pascal, however, unlike some Italian politicians, was a true Swiss, incorruptible and steadfastly stoic. He kept his mouth firmly shut and politely avoided falling for the undeniable womanly charm and profoundly female irresistibility of the best of Germany and America.
Last weekend I went to a FullyBooked, a bookstore that I really love, because of the variety of books that they have. They also have this comforting feeling whenever I enter the bookstore, which makes me want to go back now and then. FullyBooked allows its customers to read the book, for as long as they are going to read it in the designated places only. Some of their branches also have coffee shops, which is good, since reading and coffee are my things.
She neverhad been hit before
Jesus left that place and came to his hometown. His disciples followed him. On the Sabbath, he began to teach in the synagogue. Many who heard him were surprised. “Where did this man get all this? What’s this wisdom he’s been given? What about the powerful acts accomplished through him? Isn’t this the carpenter? Isn’t he Mary’s son and the brother of James, Joses, Judas, and Simon? Aren’t his sisters here with us?
What the heck am I going to call Casanova? Sangiovese?
“Look out the windows!!” I screamed at Annie, who was still in bed.
Hm. Well, that reference to patriotism makes me think from the outset she ain't so serious or committed to her argument. There is indeed an urgent truth in her declaration that we need to engage more, through reading, with the political issues of our day. She quotes from John Lanchester's Whoops! Why Everyone Owes Everyone and No One Can Pay, the nonfiction book he wrote as a result of research for his forthcoming novel, Capital. He sums up the way we have become politically-intellectually disenfranchised : 'We'd all rather be in the back seat of the car, with our parents in the front, driving. But now we've woken up doing 90.'
1. My friend
The Chapter 11 filing by Betsey Johnson LLC will see most of the chain’s 63 stores close, a person familiar with the matter said. Steven Madden Ltd., which owns the Betsey Johnson license, likely will keep four or five flagships in New York City and a few other cities, the person said.
After taking the purikura we decided to have dinner since we were all starving! We went to Takumi and because it’s such a good place to eat we of course had to wait in the queue but luckily it was a small queue and after 10 minutes we could go inside. We got a typical Japanese floor seat spot and all ordered different kinds of ramen dishes and gyouza. I love Takumi’s food so much, I could eat there every week hahah!! (Down side is that they are rather pricy but
Pack beech leaves into an earthenware or glass jar until it’s about nine-tenths full. Pour the gin over the leaves, making sure they are well covered (they will oxidize and turn brown if exposed). Let steep for 7-10 days so the leaves can release their striking green pigment. Strain the infused June through cheesecloth or a jelly strainer bag.
I have also decided that I would probably like to re-shell Joeby and that will most likely mean that I will sell Elsie's plate too. While I really do adore both dolls, their sculpts just don't fit in aesthetically with my gang. It will be a very sad sale but I think I may have found a decent replacement for Joeby; A Leeke Arien. I think i'll see if I can get the replacement before I part with her current Zaoll Luv self just incase I make a huge mistake but incase any of you readers would be interested - let me know.
February 2012 - Page Loads 29,808 Unique Visits 20,152
EDITED TO ADD: How excited was I to realize I can link to WIP Wednesday with this post? REALLY REALLY EXCITED. *g*
Surely such pure beauty can reach down and touch her scars.
He stepped over her. At her feet he sat down in a lotus position and Kate noticed he had a box in his hands. He flicked a switch. Wooden legs dropped from the side of the box, allowing him to place it, raised, onto the floor.
When I sit down to write out my next new amazing blog post, I want it to be right. That's the way I am with most things in my life. I don't half ass anything. Because I do that, it prevents me from doing a lot of things that I want to do. Example, writing a blog post every other day.
I don’t want my (hopefully) loyal readers to think I’m going to post every day. I don’t want you to get tired of me! I do have to share this, though. I’ve been laughing about it for a full day. This little tidbit appeared in the Colombo Sunday Observer yesterday. It was hidden a few paragraphs down in an article about cobblers (who, in Sri Lanka, are street vendors that spread out a blanket on the sidewalk and fix shoes and bags).
Mary Heussenstamm's career began in nursing, but she always had an interest in art and frequently sketched pencil drawings of her patients. Upon her retirement at the age of 59, she began painting watercolors, using multiethnic models on the streets of Los Angeles as subjects. I discovered her book featuring 100 of these watercolor portraits and I immediately knew this collection had to be mine in spite of how pricey it was. I was drawn to her incredible ability to depict the play of light and shadow upon different faces, and the expressions she was able to capture in less than an hour for each portrait. The simple cleanliness of her paintings and her masterful use of color truly left me in awe. Heussenstamm passed away in 2005 from Parkinson's and Alzheimer's disease.
The alumni response
“Just chase out the Touhou maniacs and fujoshi and I’ll go.”
So this is the recipe I meant to post last weekend, but never had the chance. Remember when I spoke of that awesome green chili in my previous post about breakfast burritos? Well, after my trip to Colorado, I was on a mission.
While we sit listening.
Also - I plan on grading the final table so that there are several number tracks, one that runs through the whole table (as above), and 3 others that will cover the three negative modifiers, -1, -2 and -3. That way your hireling with a Charisma of 4 won't have the same defining feature as the one with a Charisma of 7. Obviously each trait will need to be 'graded' somehow, and I expect some overlap (so the table above might have 3 separate 1d6 tracks covering 2-7, 6-11, 11-16, for example)
Back home now, ready for a bath and early to bed since we have to get up early tomorrow to catch a bus and train to head down the coast to meet Kathy’s nephew.
Throw everything in a bowl, mix well, chill for at least an hour to let the flavors blend. Enjoy. Eat as much as you want. Not joking. This is very low in calories, high in fiber, capsaicin from the pepper speeds up the metabolism. Carrots are PACKED with vitamin A, Folic Acid, the B vitamins, vitamin C. It a fat soluble veggie which means that its better for your when it’s digested with a tiny amount of fat (hence the Olive oil in the recipe) Good for your heart, your eyes, and to ward against cancer. In fact there are studies showing that people who ate carrots regularly were less than half as likely to get any type of cancer compared to those who never/rarely eat them.
To obtain ice flakes:
Sex is something that’s real important to the Smartards. It may or may not be because most of the Smartards aren’t HAVING any sex, but that’s beside the point. The real point is… well, the real point is a giant rubber cock that is scientifically sculpted to hit your clit perfectly. That’s what the real point is.
Cartridges: George and Basic Shapes, Easter 2010
Here is a sample of some of the artwork I colored from this new collection. It was fun to work on something so large. We have some posters that are 10" x 14" and some posters that are up to 22" x 32.5" Wow! That gives you a lot of space to create a beautiful work of art for your home or as a custom gift.
I’ve just come back from some strange corner of the internet where tables sit on ceilings, birds swim, sharks fly, cats dig up their own shit and a bunch of children have forced a guy called Kony to become their one-man army.
The department is fighting tooth and nail to block such an outcome. One Washington state representative - who is also a Seattle police officer - has introduced a state bill that would block federal court orders mandating use-of-force requirements on local police departments unless such orders are backed by an act of the U.S. Congress.
This is the way I clean the kitchen because this is where he will eat.
The interesting thing (again, one of many) is how easy I am finding it to make some time each day to sit down and write. Having a specific target in mind – to write a short story – allows some focus without being too restricting. Therefore I look forward to it; my mind wanders between ideas throughout the day and I prioritise that part of the day when I mean to write.I suppose it is proving to me that dedicating myself to my dream of writing is not as difficult as I might have imagined. I find excuses and barriers to distract me and procrastinate about the act of writing when, actually, it would make more sense to physically write than admonish myself about not writing!
New Social Media. I won’t enumerate the different new media that are now used by many people for I may be mistaken, or for I may miss some. I just want to share this insight that I grasped from the reading. Let us be smart on how to use these media, and let us use them while they are giving a lot of opportunities for they won’t be forever “in” or cool for everyone. They won’t be always beneficial and won’t be forever new. Let us learn to use the most beneficial and most effective medium/media for our needs and businesses, and make the best out of it.
I know what everyone is thinking — Mimi Rogers — now that’s a big name for a guest appearance. Well, how about Cybill Shepherd? Cybill plays Riley’s mother, Lynette. There’s another big name…
I'm so very excited to have her to share her absolutely gorgeous home and ideas with us...
307) a neighbourhood dinner next door...tasty curried chicken and tender lamb and tomato stew
I doubt I will be looking for Thonet furniture when back in the US .. although one should never say never.
Love always, Elisa
VOV Castle Dew 4 Colours Colour Shot Eye in #2
Why do we have such difficulty putting self out of the way? Why do
- Tiny crostini topped with wasabi mayonnaise, honey soy seared steak slices and a pickled ginger garnish
Other changes:
“Continue in prayer, and watch in the same with thanksgiving; withal praying also for us, that God would open unto us a door of utterance, to speak the mystery of Christ,”
4″ set of 26 Baby ABC bunting flags
But after watching our formerly quiet country road in Silverton, sprout 200+ McMansions over the last 10 years, we knew we wanted the peace and quiet acreage would provide.
The English language has some wonderfully anthropomorphic collective nouns for the various groups of animals.
This is a blogger who I've read for a few years & have always enjoyed, but as soon as my friend said this, I realized she was right. I don't have kids, but my sister has four & enough of my close friends have babies & toddlers that I have a pretty good idea of how they feel & how they feel like they look those first few years. There's not enough Spanx in the world for any of them to put a picture of themselves on the internet six months after giving birth & especially not sitting down in front of a plate of food.
Or the fact that the movie itself was such a bad idea that just presenting it in plain old "there it is" terms just doesn't work as well as just flat-out lying about what it is.
Wooden tray (right of stove): World Market
In the end, I think that Belcher has presented an excellent option to these Ecclesiologies. He calls this third way the deep church. I struggle a bit with his discussion on politics and worship. While I agree that those in the emergent camp too often focus on arts when talking about culture and agree that Christians need to be involved in all aspects of culture, I think that Christians need to be careful here. Too often we have adopted a worldly political system and named it Christian (whether it be conservative or liberal). We cannot afford to do that and maintain our witness. At this point of very divisive politics, Christians need to be questioning hard both poles of the political spectrum. Belcher hints at this but the warning needs to be stronger.
Hell, yeah, Murphy still has a few hoots and a hollerin left in him...
Hi there! I’m Kimberly, the newest addition to The Yarn Club family. Many of you may know me from the STITCHES Knitting Expos and my previous work with Knitter’s magazine (I’m the one constantly wearing the bunny ears at fiber events). That chapter of my life came to a close last month, but as one door closes, another one opens. I am very “hoppy” to be working with Andrea and the girls at The Yarn Club. My specialty is Social Media so I will be helping out with our Blog, Facebook, Ravelry, and other e-media. You can also find me in the shop on Thursdays and Saturdays. Since Andrea has had absolutely no time to write I will be keeping everyone up to date with all the happenings at The Club. Here are some of the highlights since May and some events to look forward to this Fall...
So remember that new fathers. Just a dose of God... a weakened strain.
ALSO, I'm looking for information on the following bands from this comp: Easy Target, Clothesline, Slappy
The teen girls are told by their male teacher that it is natural and beautiful for him to stand before them naked as a jay-bird as he teaches. He tells them he is sure their parents will understand that just because his genitalia is exposed to the girls means nothing. His penis is beautiful and to be seen and admired by his teen girl students.
I don't know whether Peter will end up applying to any of the schools we visited earlier this month, much less attending one. The idea was just to start exploring the universe of liberal-arts colleges.
Here I am again, believing with all my heart that I'm about to have a baby; one that I get to keep. I just hope that this time, I'm right.
His position with the authorities wasn’t help by the fact that he was a hugely popular figure in Prague and thousands turned up just to watch him train. As the other players trained together, Bican’s training would resemble a circus act designed to entertain the paying crowd. He would place empty bottles on the crossbar of a goal and then proceed to knock them off one-by-one with shots from 20 yards away. It is said that he would maybe miss one in ten on a good day.
I would go on raving about this, but it’s easier to take a look at what I’m talking about. Go to McCoy's blog for photos, menus, course descriptions, beer descriptions, etc. Next month will be a Latin-themed dinner, followed by a barbecue/smoked beers theme in September.
Happy Dance! We are so going to do this in our master bath when the time comes (it has the cabinet). This project cost us under $80 (saw included... so $40, really).
Regal Art for the sentiment.
We'll have that huge stump ground down first.
Participated in 31,343 educational contacts
2. a person who is incapable of serious thought or concentration
8. Favorite pattern? Navy and white stripes… fleur-de-lis…..lace flowers…
Peeling back the skin, and, then, tearing if off,
At the same hospital, researcher Dr. Ranjip Singh is experimenting with a device that can erase traumatic memories.
2 1/4 tsp active dry yeast
After making the line available during Golden Week to a single department store chain (point-of-purchase display shown below), Gakken sent its salespeople to other retailers and took so many orders that they’ve already decided to make more!
The two-day vote is a reaction to EU-brokered talks between Belgrade and Pristina, with many local politicians arguing that the Serbian government should not be talking to the authorities in Pristina, much less making deals with them.
Black.
That said, Sean and I have no reason to believe that we are unable to have children biologically. There are several reasons we have decided to pursue foster care and possibly adopting at this point in our lives, prior to having biological children.
i used a piece of brown paper bag on this, wanna play "i spy"?
Harlequin blue Harlequin relish inserts and candleholders - Homer Laughlin China
With all the stories about kids duct taped, I was only partially surprised when I read about a flight attendant who, as a joke, put a toddler in the overhead compartment on a Virgin Airline flight (here). Though the stories I read on this don't have much detail, I also wonder how the flight attendant got a hold of the toddler. What were the parents doing while the flight attendant had the toddler? What the hell?
-- from GoodReads.Com
23.) “The beautiful part of writing is that you don’t have to get it right the first time unlike, say, brain surgery.”–R. Cormier
I've been working on a short story, lately. I'm going to offer it to Dark Moon, eventually. It's their "women's" issue. I thought the title "Mother Knows Best" would nail down that this is a woman's story.
You give us the greens of summers
They have asked nothing of me in return and, yet, I would give them my life.
You shook my soul and scattered my pride. You made sure you had won…
Strangely enough, during the montage scene showing the different places Schani goes, the title cards are sourced from a different print, with black bars on the top and bottom of the image. It’s misaligned, and faded back into the main print but it brings up the question if the film is in its original aspect ratio. Considering it was made for television, 1:33:1 (full screen) seems to be the proper ratio, but since the plan included a European theatrical release it still possible it was reframed.
Above our television sits lyrics from one of my favorite tunes from childhood.
Hope. And talking to trusted friends on the phone/via e-mial/via online chat/via text. And wine. And hot, hot baths. And good books. And making art. And eating, obviously, damnit!
So, I'm bringing myself up-to-date.
As is the case with both swing trading and position trading as well, a trader needs to have a trading strategy that has proven to be profitable and that the trader is comfortable executing. His plan must include risk management rules to adhere to if he is to achieve consistent success.
Have a good nite☆
Make sure you come back for next week's very special guest. Next week's featured guest blogger, John, is none other than one of the 60 Mile Men. You can find him on twitter @60miles or on his blog 60 Miles: 316,800 Feet Closer to a Cure.
Session 2
The can quickly grew into an ugly debt-filled barrel as heavy as concrete and so big that it couldn't be kicked down the road anymore.
As Moe ticked through the various reasons education is the next big “undercapitalized” sector of the economy, like healthcare in the 1990s, he also read through a list of notable venture investment firms that recently completed deals relating to the education-technology sector, including Sequoia and Benchmark Capital. Kleiner Perkins, a major venture capital firm and one of the first to back Amazon.com and Google, is now investing in education technology, Moe noted.
sweet voice ever again singing?
The invention of time keeping devices has been very important to our history. But it is something that has evolved slowly. Shepherds used to tell the time by the position of the sun and how now we can laugh when all we have to do today is flick back our sleeves and look at our wristwatch to know the time by the exact second.
The Junky’s Christmas – William S. Burroughs
Then she asked if she could examine my bones. (She just wanted to cop a feel on me guys.)
5/9/2012
That's a sinking feeling I've just had to get used to the last few years. The fact that my daughter turns corners on her own now and then disappears from my sight.
For my surrounding air hath a new lightness;
“The Republic” by Plato. This work is the jumping-off point for ideals of justice and personal moral growth, which is essential knowledge for living in our world today. I’m not much of a traditionalist, but sometimes reminding ourselves of the fundamentals can really provide important perspective.
Pricey at $6 a dozen. But the quality, the colour and the taste were very, very good. Yum!
Daniel A. Starr — Associate Professor, Department of Molecular and Cellular Biology
Any miracles occurring in your garden or any that you hope will this spring?
Sorry mice, leave my van alone.
Barnard
Anything else?: If you’re from London travelling to a midweek game then beware – the last train to the metropolis leaves Leicester before 10.00pm, so you’ll likely have to leave the game before the end.
Address: Homemaker Centre, 100 Pearcedale Pde
The basic supplies you will need are:
23:30 – 00:30 B-Front
The women continued the theme of "redemption" as leadoff Lauryn Williams repeated Dix's performance by blazing the turn and giving the women a lead they would never relinquish. Allyson Felix held form before Jamaican Kerron Stewart tried to bring her team back on the third leg. Games gold medalist Shelly Ann Fraser attempted to do the same on anchor, but current world leader, Carmelita Jeter, turned on the jets and ran away from Fraser on her way to leading the US squad to a 42.40 victory and world lead over Jamaica's 42.77.
FALLING SKIES focuses on the resilience of the survivors and their determination to maintain their humanity when all else has been destroyed. It is a tale of endurance, commitment and courage in which everyday people are called upon to become heroes. They may be outmatched, outnumbered and outgunned, but nothing can beat the human spirit. Most of all, the series is about the ties that bind people together in the most difficult of circumstances.
Her work is of portrait, statue and dolls. Here will be the focus of portraits. Her style is fairy, gothic, cartoon-style with big eyes. If you’re anything like me, your first instinct is to roll your own eyes and walk away. With an open mind eager for flavor and perspective…I continued the search.
I had the pleasure a little while back to shoot with burlesque performer/artist Marlo Marquise. Marlo is a charming woman and a pleasure to talk to. She is also an artist and exhibits her paintings in various galleries in New York.
Gates is such a good big brother still. He tries to be so helpful and will take it upon himself to go make bottles, (not a good thing, he makes a mess), he gives them his pacie, wants to hold them even though he isn’t that much bigger then them any more and will dance and sing for them to make them happy.
One weeknight in February, she told me that was ready to have sex, and wanted to do it that weekend when I came to visit her since her roommate would be out of town. At first, she had said that she didn’t want to lose her virginity in her dorm room because that was “cliche,” but that week she told me she changed her mind and wanted to have sex with me. Score!
What I miss: Being able to shave *ahem* down below without having to do some pretty amazing shower acrobatics. I have a feeling it's going to be all by "feel" from her on out... yikes!
Then you went up a notch or two in their book when I called them, furious that you had tried to talk me out of it. And you even used the word “forbid.” Poo. Have you now learned the redhead does what she wants?
Did you catch that FAR FAR away part?
Would the land take me in for all of my Days.
”You guys heard? Osama Bin Ladin was shot last night!”
The award show wasn’t the only party in town. Some of yall may remember back in the day when Def Jam used to throw those Pre Soul Train parties??? Can we say OFF the chain! Well, Jamie Foster Brown and Sister 2 Sister have grabbed the torch on this and hosted a 22nd Anniversary party the night before the awards. Er’body was in the building! And Jamie was stunning! I mean daggone fabulously stunning! I was bumping into the homies all over the place too: Sheri Riley, April Love, Kita Williams, Ronda Penrice (author of African American History for Dummies. Pick up a copy today), Barry Florence, Kim Cooper and even my boy Darius McCrary.
This companion novel to The Forest of Hands and Teeth was always going to be a must-read for me. Much as I try to avoid hardback novels (because I read on the move and they're heavy to cart around everywhere) there was just no way I could wait for the paperback of this one.
I've been feeling put-upon and underappreciated all day, for no real reason that I can tell. I warned Pod to stay out of my way, because I might bite. I lost my temper several times over the sheer amount of crap that keeps ending up on the floor -- food particles, toys, clothes, discarded wrappers -- and probably frightened the children. Even the household tasks that I do like -- laundry, grocery shopping, and bathroom cleaning (for real! I will come over and clean your bathroom if you will come to my place and dust) -- pissed me off.
One sound that I love is the sound of a fretless bass, but I never felt I knew how to play bass well enough to find the correct pitches accurately on the fretless bass fretboard, unless I were to dedicate the next decade to practicing and getting better, as a fretless bass player. I felt I would always be doomed to playing just slightly off key, the whole time.
Basic-$599
The Boys who supply the Daylight held things together as the situation became more dire by the week it seemed, and did an outstanding Big Blue job. Now that health is returning to fortify the Line, the Giants and their Big Blue fan base should move forward with an increasing confidence knowing Giants Football still means Running With Power.
Finally, Krauss appears to have made some statements that look simply silly, and Massimo calls him out on them. One is this:
Challenge 14: to post July 1
The airline did not give financial details of the deal nor say where it had acquired the shares from. The Irish government holds 25 percent of Aer Lingus but earlier this year said it wanted to sell its stake.
I went to order new glasses!
Which I'm convinced is actually OK as long as my brains are sane and, when they are feeling insane, I know where to go to rectify the problem.
A most known stat from the World Health Organization: We have a 1 in 10 million chance of dying in a plan crash and a 1 in 300 chance of dying from a medical error in a hospital. A must read book by Joe and Teresa Graedons, “Top Screwups Doctors Make & How To Avoid Them”, gives you tips for stopping hospital blunders.
I use the Google Chrome browser for most of my Internet needs. While Chrome didn’t always allow extensions or addons (as Firefox calls them) to their browser, the browser is now equipped with a full arsenal of extensions. StayFocusd is the extension designed to limit the amount of time you waste on the Internet at unproductive websites.
Since it is always the same cartridge, I believe there may be a defect with that one.
While my new shoes cost more than the rest of my outfit combined (which usually doesn't happen, unless we're talking running shoes), the rest of this outfit was very thrifty. Linked up to The Pleated Poppy for What I Wore Wednesday.
I pressed the button to lower my window and handed him a five dollar bill. He took the money and said something to me, but I couldn’t hear him over the traffic sounds. He smiled though, and put the five in his front pants pocket. I looked up to see if the light was green and saw a city policemen walking toward the old man. I pointed out my window at the officer so the older man wouldn’t be surprised. I rolled up my window and started to pull away, the light had turned green.
I actually use my white dishes so they probably won't get dusty between uses.
I have said before I like colors in cycles, and I have a new obsession as of late: highlighter yellow. Neons seem to be creeping back into popularity lately and it all started with a purse I saw at Target…and later bought.
But I think there is something to that.
Emerson nonchalantly shrugged. “Don’t mean shit to me, Captain. Let’s just get this over with.”
I have been a bad blogger. I haven't been able to take a moment to chill in the past few weeks. I actually wrote the below post on October 1st and I'm just now finishing it.
51. Been a cheerleader? - No! LOL! I'm the non-sporty girl. Drama Geek, yes. Cheerleader, no.
He could mount the ultimate low-tech denial of service attack, and smash your computer with a sledgehammer.
I couldn't find any video of Joyce in 'Sugar', so enjoy this clip of her on 'Match Game' instead:
all mommy would say was "syd, who is watching?"
A half pound ground chicken
The two of us were comedians and pretty ladies, if I do say so myself. (Hey, if you don’t like yourself, no one will like you!)
I took it upon myself to begin some stretching exercises, because if I sat around waiting for my doc to send me for physio or something, I'd be waiting a hella long time, my next appointment to see him is in three months. I'm going very slow with the movements, I do as much as pain will allow of course, but I figure the answer is not to curl up in a ball and stiffen up completely, I gotta keep on keepin' on. Who knows, perhaps by springtime I will be able to start taking my beloved walks again! Yup ;)
But, I didn’t regret it one bit!
Yesterday’s revelations about Chinese loans to local government poolswinners have added another dimension to Beijing’s problems. I was surprised the piece here didn’t get more hits – the scandal does, after all, involve a likely Beijing write-off of a sum totalling nearly three times the size of the US bank bailout of 2008. It doesn’t have any of the potential for contagion, but let’s get real here: we have a stop-start gerontocracy in China grappling to control private property inflation, chronic housing shortgages, huge wealth imbalances, overspent infrastructure budgets, and most of its trade customers going bankrupt. The likelihood that China will soon shrink as an outlet for Western consumer goods has now become a near-certainty, but the coverage given to this development was minimal. Anyway, you read it here first.
In Leviticus 10:8 G-d spoke to Aaron and gave several commandments. I wonder if one of the things G-d mentioned revealed a sin in Aaron life for which he wanted to bring an additional sin offering or guilt offering as described in Leviticus 4. Aaron was only reluctant to eat the sin offering on that day. Maybe he wanted to wait until after atoning for his own sin before partaking in a more general sin offering? If you have any thoughts please leave a comment on this post. Thank you!
Friday the 16th – “Undefeated” boxing bill (Coldwell Boxing) @ The New Bingley Hall, Hockley, Birmingham – Headlined by a local derby between Jamie Ball and Nasser Al Harbi for the English light-middleweight title, which sounds suspiciously like a proper fight.
Friday, and the last two distilleries on our list. Caol Ila and Bunnahabhain. The Bunnahabhain distillery was set in the most beautiful surroundings, and of all the malts I’d tried, was definitely my favourite.
When treated with the necessary respect, a well-placed epigraph can work wonders. Even Elmore Leonard won’t dismiss them. In his draconian set of rules for how to write (which is really a set of rules for how to write like Elmore Leonard), he strikes off the prologue, the foreword and the introduction (as well as most modifiers, adjectives and adverbs), but the epigraph he leaves alone. One of Leonard’s authorial dedications itself reads like a sort of epigraph. “To my wife, Joan”, he writes, at the start of Freaky Deaky, “for giving me … a certain look when I write too many words.”
I'd like to Celebrate the Start of Spring and the coming of Easter with giving you a full sized kit free, for this weekend only!!
Growth has been fast too in the number of retailers who trade through eBay. More than 180,000 businesses now do so, up from around 120,000 in 2009.
When I do someone’s Tarot, I am mainly using my psychic ability. Occasionally spirits do present themselves and step forward and that’s when my mediumstic skill kicks in, but generally a Tarot reading relies solely on psychic insight.
And I'm ready to meet our son. Finally. He can bake for a few more weeks, but it's nice to know that mentally now I'm ready for his arrival. I don't know why it takes me so long to get a connection like that to my babies, but luckily it comes just at the right time. Maybe I'm protecting myself. In any case, we're ready whenever it's time for him to be born.
Days pass without word from Emmett, leading Drew to take chances she wouldn't ordinarily take in order to find him. Her mother becomes upset with these antics, which she considers general teenage stupidity. But once Drew solves the mystery of Emmett, the story takes turn after turn as she attempts to help Emmett reach his ultimate goal.
-THE CHOCOLATE WAR by Robert Cormier -- also classic.
1 awakening
And frighten myself with the thought of my little ones burning
She's another one that makes me want to be more experimental with my dressing.
-I am I am...said the Dutchess ...you must know I missed you all ever so much...!
I had a funny pain running up and down
huhu…this is my preview…
Heat 2 tsp of oil in a kadai/pan and when the oil is hot, put in the jeera/cumin seeds and let it splutter away. Switch off fire...count to 25....put in red chilly powder, turmeric and give it a mix (if the oil is too hot the chilly powder will get burnt).
Visit Jericho; this ain’t Dorothy’s Kansas, Toto.
Our father was a charming cellist of Cherokee descent, who loved melancholy women and chamber music. He wore shell necklaces and tapestry vests, and wrote short stories about legless hobo angels who traveled around in boxcars.
How it works: They will be attracted by the fruit and fly inside, only to get stuck in the vinegar and sugar mixture.
“Definitely, I wouldn’t have signed it. Part of our family is Caribbean.”
There are different ways in which one could articulate such an inquiry. The key question here is what resources one is entitled to use in explaining the deontic notions (obligation and permission). I take it that these notions are to be understood in terms of practical rationality (i.e., in terms of the way they function as reasons for and against action), which itself can only be understood alongside theoretical rationality (i.e., in terms of the notion of reasons per se). However, I also take it that rationality must itself be understood in deontic terms. On the one hand, the force of reasons is a matter of obliging (dispositive reasons) or entitling (probative reasons) one to adopt a conclusion. On the other, there are general obligations one undertakes insofar as one is involved in any reasoning at all (e.g., the obligation to work out the consequences of one’s commitments and the obligation to eliminate any incompatibilities amongst them by retracting some of them). As such, I take it that the deontic notions cannot be explained in non-deontic terms. However, this does not mean that this explanatory strategy locks us into a vicious circle. Instead, we can see this strategy as embodying a virtuous circle, in which, although we do not reduce the deontic to something else, we nonetheless make explicit its structure by way of the specific obligations which constitute the structure of rationality.
Walk and love and see
5. As a result of W-P's intentional misconduct, anti-scientific approach and incompetence, the Town of Orleans has been split politically into bitter disputes among neighbors and friends. Taxpayers have been misinformed about the projected costs of this project to be imposed on the property tax structure--without betterments--and the cost of removal of their Title 5 systems. They have been lied to about the environmental impacts of freshwater overloading on Namskaket Creek. They have been misled by false claims of septic nitrogen overloading on town watersheds.
I arrived at my 8:45am interview, fifteen minutes late. Breathing heavily like I had just run up the sears tower, I managed to compose myself in the elevator. I was dressed to the teeth, like a young woman running for office, I really wanted to impress this employer.
and have loads of UFO's that need a better
When we walk like (we are rushing), we print anxiety and sorrow on the earth. We have to walk in a way that we only print peace and serenity on the earth… Be aware of the contact between your feet and the earth. Walk as if you are kissing the earth with your feet.
“Again,” he hissed, “You misunderstand me.” He threw her to the ground and roared “It was not an invitation!”
“The Vermilion City Recreation Department is accepting baseball and softball registration forms for anyone under the age of 15. Applications are available in the high school main office. The deadline to submit your application is April 27th.”
There are downsides to frugality. We move very slowly on home improvements, and we aren't the first couple to struggle with disparate ideas of what "has to be done". Joe always preferred spending time in the garden to working on the house, and I was barely keeping up with housework with little ones to mind. Joe also has a bit of the packrat in him -- he grew up on a wheat farm in Kansas, with older parents who'd survived the Great Depression. It was always a relief to leave behind the chaos of our ever-increasing load of stuff and get on the road with a well-defined set of necessities and truly valued luxuries.
would you like a taste baby
Not just any kind of it, oh no! It was the national championship in archery. I qualified and so did my son. My Main Squeeze accompanied us which I found very nice and reassuring.
Yes, yes. I know.
I’m probably not the first, but I call it my “Writer’s Zone.” The more time I spend in the “Zone,” the easier it is to slip back into it when sitting down at the computer. Writing momentum builds gradually and then when it is at its peak, sustains itself even when not hunched over the keyboard. It is the strangest feeling. I’d walk away to load the dishwasher, or run an errand, or work in the yard, and words, sentences, ideas, or stuff that needed to be edited would come to me out of the blue. I learned to keep a pencil and paper handy to jot things down because if I didn’t, in a flash like fireworks, it would disappear into thin air. But the point is, the more I wrote, the more the writing wrote itself.
Profitably doth He go over what has been said, and convicts indolence unto things helpful of proceeding from love of evil, and of having its root in unwillingness to learn those things whereby one may become wise and good. For the doer of evil, says He, flees from and refuses the being in the Divine Light: not hiding from shame on account of evil (for so he would have been saved) but desiring to remain in ignorance of what is becoming, lest transgressing he should be smitten, falling upon the now keener convictions of his own conscience, and by means of at length clearly knowing what is good, should pay a more woeful account to the Judge, if he should not do what was pleasing to God. But he that doeth truth (that is, the lover and doer of the works of the Truth) cometh to the light, that his deeds may be made manifest that they are wrought in God. For he doth not reject the illumination in the Spirit, by It specially led to be able to |178 understand in all calm collectedness, whether he hath transgressed the Divine commandment, and whether he hath wrought all things according to the Law of God.
A couple of weeks ago, I had went to the Pacific Design Center with my friend Carlos to attend Westweek which is just a gathering for a lot of designers so that they can check out new trends in the industry by visiting the showrooms, listen to talks and demonstrations given out by famous designers, and pretty much just mingle with other designers (and students like me!)
泊梦点2句：
Small golden flecks do a dance at my feet
Still, we were high up, so the view from the apartment was gorgeous, even on the typically overcast day. I unhooked the various cables tethering me to the table and took the laptop and sheet of paper to the couch. I waited for the computer to find a wireless network while I looked at the list of names.
But what price no sex with guys as gorgeous as Cooper and March? And in this film they are tall, well-dressed and full of callow insecurity coupled with 'they don't know how hot they are" extra hotness -- and the result my favorite performance from either of them. I don't think I've ever seen March more relaxed, less like his usual coiled spring thespian self, or Cooper more beautiful, almost feminine with his eye liner and creaseless face. Look at his visage in the top picture; not a furrow on either's brow. Or look into Cooper's haunting eyes, has he ever seemed more alive or intelligent or sensual? Together they display the kind of rapport you seldom see in men outside of a rock band, the military, or Howard Hawks movies (Hawks collaborator Ben Hecht wrote the script loosely patterned off of Noel Coward, for whom the boy-boy romance was surely more complicated).
I'm getting much better not ruminating as to why something happened, but rather, what I going to do to solve it.
Food fads come and go. Of course they do, that’s why they’re called fads, for goodness sake. But chicken soup? That’s a classic that’s not going anywhere!. It’s like a rock! It may be a liquid but you know what I mean, and I think you do. Enough said? Say no more!
If the barbaric manslaughter cross the border into Texas, where the white color finance’s of drug trade have their mansions, the next civil war will be inside America. Because the American population is heavily armed.
It has only been commonly used as a given name since the 20th century, influenced by two plays featuring the character: William Butler Yeats' 'Deirdre' (1907) and J. M. Synge's 'Deirdre of the Sorrows' (1910).
Let us first begin with the “Doctor fix,” which is a $208 billion spending measure to restore the reimbursement rates for doctors who treat Medicare patients. If it isn’t passed, the current rate – which already leaves hospitals and many doctors losing money to treat Medicare patients – would be slashed by an additional 21 percent. It simply has to be fixed, or doctors and hospitals will quit treating Medicare patients.
I'm just supping on my whisky and coke when I hear the faintest of voices behind me -
Mildred, for some reason, reacts fairly calmly to that, whereas I would have beaten the crap out of him and then called the police. She just whines about how he’s filling Veda’s head with all kinds of nonsense and setting her against her mother, even though she was already pretty firmly on that path before Monty came along.
“Thank you all for your presence tonight! Deepest apologies, but one of our premium performers cancelled and we’ve allowed a peasant from the coast named, hmm hmm, Scott Mitchell to recite HIS FIRST sonnet during intermission. Perhaps use this time to visit the restrooms or getting refreshments.”
Nobody told me then the moths ate on souls. And in the years that followed I have missed those nights of transluscent wings.
to her bosom, and he was her empty vessel,
Since the mantels are already full, I decorate the sideboard in the dining room instead.
That explained why Jashi looked so grim, at least. Far too close. Pevan wrapped her arm around the other woman, grabbing a handful of her dress at her hip. She felt her own clothes tighten as Jashi took hold of the leather strap at her shoulder. The harness should provide more strength than plain fabric, but Pevan hadn't tested it yet herself.
I fully expect to simulcast my first Disney post this week.
It took a few seconds before she answered, “I did like it. Probably too much.”
There's a legend attached to Poinsettias and it is rather pleasant.
An agricultural product producer shall timely eliminate, re-collect agricultural films, packing materials of agricultural inputs, etc. so as to prevent them from polluting the environment of place of origin of agricultural products.
Organic Stevia (can also use organic agave or organic maple syrup)
10. What you want 4:19
Starting the work week with hot chocolate because the temp was in the 40s.
And then comes the moment when I realize that the place where someone has stationed me for interviews is, comically enough, right in front of the shower doors. It’s not enough that gigantic men are strolling all around me swathed only in what look like miniscule white washcloths, which occasionally drop to the floor menacingly. And that all I really want is to show these men the professional courtesy of not staring at them.
Three deputies arrived, and Jackson-Burch allowed them to make a warrantless search of her cell phone, according to the lawsuit. In the subsequent sheriff’s report, a deputy wrote that they found no evidence of cheating and that Jackson-Burch believed the incident was racially motivated, the lawsuit stated.
The precious name of Jesus!
My precious baby sister got married this weekend. I can hardly look at this picture without crying. This post should be so much longer, but I can't begin to express it in words yet. :) (and I don't have very many pictures, either)
Yesterday morning we arrived to essaouira, a windy city I hear is known for the good surfing possibilities... anyone been? let me know if you have any good tips on what to do or visit..
Green chilli-1,finely chopped
p.s. Sorry it's been so long since I last posted. I'll try not to go so long without dropping a line next time. We've just been so busy trying to enjoy EVERYTHING fall has to offer while the weather cooperates. I've also been really busy with graphic design jobs but I've completed a lot of projects so hopefully I'll be back for a spell.
My humble beginning of this recipe is; cabbage, Korean deep fry flour*, plain flour, Korean soy sauce, sesame oil.
before we'd hear of him again.
Then… Grace came along.
Most developed countries like Australia, Canada and U.K set an English proficiency test for immigrants and only those who pass the test are able to work and live there.
Let me tell you a story:
No reason that would do
Hope you like the little clip art piccie, it's how the computer makes me feel sometimes, lol. Feel free to save it and use it if you like it, it's free from clker.com
I’ve kind of grown up with the movies about Jason and his macabre killings but I never really fancied them much… I think my only reason for watching horror movies in my teens was that they had a really high chance of showing me some boobs… even the re-make succeeds in this. I had to laugh a little of the macabre scene under the pier as the blonde was covered up under water but got to show off her boobs yet one more time before her part of the movie was over (as he lift her out of the water with the machete stuck in her head). This is the kind of movie I watch once and only once… Still not bad for a horror flick tho.
Sat. Fat: 1g
Defeating the drug of masturbation.
Enjoy brunch or dinner at Capitol Garage. Bottomless mimosas for $6.95 are available at brunch. Dinner is $49.95 and includes two salads, two entrees, dessert and a bottle of house wine or champagne.
Zhu JL, Knudsen LE, Andersen AM, Hjollund NH, Olsen J. Laboratory work and pregnancy outcomes: a study within the National Birth Cohort in Denmark. Occup Environ Med 2006; 63: 53-58.
In 2005, Topps released one of my favorite niche sets off all time, Topps Rookie Cup! (you can tell I love something by my overuse of exclamation points to describe it) It's as though they made this set just for me. Kind of a crappy design, but I don't care, they all have that fantastic little trophy on it.
Such rhetoric goes beyond merely publishing the names. The direct implication of having the name of a person charged with DWI on the DA's website is that the person is guilty.
Propane grills are slightly more expensive, starting around $100 dollars.
I will make you whole
But wait! There's more! As the party winds down, a very tipsy Muffy stumbles off to bed. She passes by the noose that was used earlier, and finds a wrapped present on her bed. It's the Jack-in-the-box that was used to scare her in the first scene. She walks up to it, and sloooooooooooooowly begins to turn the crank. When a tiny harlequin pops up, Muffy sighs with relief--then a hand comes up and slits her throat, from ear to ear!
Consider the letter making the rounds today:
Oh yes, lots of rejection. I almost gave up at one point, but that was because I made the mistake of not moving on. I was so determined that the rejected book was the best I could do, and that I couldn’t put it to one side. I had a real struggle to give up that book and then write another, and another... until finally I wrote the one that attracted an agent.
but that didn't bother you,
5) You can fall in love in a week. Rose said I love you and was ready to throw her life away for Mr. Dawson. All in seven days. There’s hope that I too can come around to the thought of love in my lifetime. Especially if he looks like Jack Dawson. I don’t know how you can make yourself immune to that kind of charm.
There was a table of four diners booked in yesterday lunchtime.
As I said, the game is fixed. The only way to unfix it is to show the wires, look up the sleeve, drag the bastards behind the curtain out by their pantslegs and expose them. Otherwise, accept slavery (perhaps accompanied by an artificial feeling of well-being) as a way of life for the 99%. Because that is where this is going.
Secondly, because Harry's success renewed interest in these writers, some of whom were out of print, and publishers invested more in promotion. Jones' Chestomanci series was reissued with new covers, and her out of print novels were re-issued. Philip Pullman's His Dark Materials trilogy is of course wonderful without the comparison to Harry, but I wonder whether it would have got the critical attention without the comparisons, despite Northern Lights being published before The Philospher's Stone.
These are the thoughts that enter his mind. Thoughts that wind up – realities of failure and calculations of the limited distance that he could run to.
Well, here's my very first post! :) I'm taking a break from writing a paper so I figured I'd go ahead and get my new blog up and running. You're probably not wondering why I started this, but I'm gonna tell you anyway. A few months ago I was introduced to the blogging world. I stumbled upon one blog, which led to two, which led to 4,5820,302. (Okay. Not that many...but there are a LOT bookmarked on my computer).
President Ramotar has taken to the TV stations and airwaves to rant and rave and expose both his vulnerability to failure and his monogamous relationship to deceit.
Ill tell you why! Because i am obviously a heart-breaking, two-timing, manipulative crook out to steal his friends game. Arrest me officer…I mean, seriously? Am i too much of a stranger to you that i cant even borrow a GAME? It was for a day. I could understand if he said “I need it by tonight because my friend is coming to pick it up.” Ok that means sense. But having to return it on a time, FROM your boyfriend. I dont think so. I seriously need to get out of this town. I am not going to be everyone’s punching bag. I am tired of everyone treating me like i am 12 and i cant do anything. My own cousin thinks i do everything wrong because i made mistakes with boys in previous relationships. (you know assuming things without asking.) I mean i thought i was being the best girlfriend there was, asking his friend for help before pouncing on my boyfriend to make sure i knew what i know.
So here's the what's what. Great tools are helpful. Tools do not define you as a cook, and I will not have anyone thinking they can't make anything I make with their hands.
I hope you have a wonderful weekend!
“Well, I don’t mind telling you what I honestly believe I saw, although I don’t want you to put me in any ridiculous light before the public. Several years ago I was engaged in the milk business and delivered milk at my customers’ houses. I had on my list a man by the name of John Day, who lived in Amity Street, near Hicks, and between Hicks and Henry. The family, which consisted of Day and his wife, lived on the top floor of the house, and were people in the ordinary walks of life. My first visit to these apartments was made one Thursday morning, just as day was breaking. The halls were dimly lighted by a gas jet burning in the upper story, and, in order to see my way up the lower flight of stairs, not being used to them, I placed a large stone against the street door to hold it open, so I might have the benefit of what little daylight there was at that early hour.
However, regardless of changing times and mores, I would still be wary of anyone who calls themselves a crook or pervert :)
Therefore the National Assembly recognizes and proclaims, in the presence and under the auspices of the Supreme Being, the following rights of man and of the citizen:
We heard amazing speakers like Dr. Tommy Nelson who pastors Denton Bible in Texas who reminded us to quit complaining and get on our faces before God who can do all things. We heard from Lisa Harper who has authored several books and has a contagious joy about her. She had me cracking up one minute and crying the next. I mean really..tears rolling down the face. Jami Smith led the music and was fabulous as always.
I am your peace when all hell breaks loose
Our challenge this week is to keep our tanks half full and to try and choose higher quality snacks. Prepare ahead of time.
8. Your favorite drink? wine
My inspiration for this card was MME's Blog Challenge 32: Card Sketch. The theme for the challenge was "you". When I went to sew the pocket yesterday, my sewing machine was all messed up so I spent a good part of last night trying to self-diagnose the problem (to no avail) and then ended up at the craft store this morning to have a repair guy look at it. Turns out a little spring was just out of place and everything was fine. Whew! I even bought new thread so the pocket looked more authentic. If I can figure it out, I will create a file with the pocket pattern and make it available for everyone.
Though the hotel management is aware that location is one of the key factors behind the hotel and restaurant’s success, initial visitors were not wild about The Restaurant’s menu. Reviewers raved about the hotel’s “exceptional” rooms, surroundings and spa, but not so much the food, which critics deemed sub-par.
The Bartlett yarn is similar to Briggs and Little Regal, with lots of VM (vegetable matter, that is, vegetation that got caught in the sheep’s wool as it was out grazing and doing whatever it is that sheep do) that I picked out as I knit. I don’t mind VM in yarn because it is an indication that the wool has not be over-processed. The yarn from Bartlett is pretty scratchy before it is washed, but it softens a lot after washing. It also blooms a lot when washed. The beanie I knitted on 3.5mm needles looks almost felted since it was washed. I’m glad I used 4.0mm needles for the ribbed hat.
What are the chances that something like this will happen soon?
This time around I’m trying (and modifying) a Cheesy Pot Pie recipe to be soy free and making it into a shepherd’s pie. I’m going to make the Velveeta filling with the ground beef and instead of using the canned crescent rolls, I’m going to use mashed potatoes instead.
When we brought skinny white cat to the vet, the vet had a minor stroke when I told her we were feeding her Purina cat food. All the cats eat Purina! It is the name I know, the name I trust! Apparently, it is complete crap. CRAP!! How am I supposed to know? It turns out I've been feeding all of my pets the equivalent of Taco Bell for the last 5 years. I switched the dog to something called "Chef Michael" which is way more expensive than the Beneful (both by Purina!) but turns out to also be CRAP!! Makes me feel terrible, you know? Like I've been feeding them Twinkies and tree bark.
Bring him home
So when you're out drinking and stumble upon a really tasty, beautifully crafted and balanced cocktail that you enjoy and find amazing, don't be afraid to tell your bartender. We love stuff like that.
Living through the effect without the consolation and excuses can be that life changing moment. We can’t and shouldn’t keep people from that. If we do, we are creating excuses and consoling ourselves out of our own fear, and then nothing changes for anyone.
On the plus side, I’m way more pleasant and fun to be around.
“Today is a day of realization: I do not like what I have become nor am I willing to accept it. Today is a new beginning and no matter what, life has to change now. No more excuses, no more reasons, no more no more.
High tide is ideal for a nature walk. The iraca palm tree, used to weave hats; the borojó aphrodisiac fruit, used for preparing beverages; and the labios de negra (black woman lips) flower, which resembles a red mouth, are among the rarities offered by the jungle vegetation.
Baggage Storage
I have never participated in this before; but, I have a confession this week. One that you can learn from.
The TV situation still needs some work. I am not very happy with that whole thing going on there. I don't like the catty corner, I don't like all the dark wood in here and I don't like all the exposed cords and components. There isn't much I do like.
BEER BARONS’ WORLD OF BEER FESTIVAL
I'm including the links to the other artists at the bottom of this post.
Is it just that we're paying closer attention, or are the elites of Forty Second Street really turning up the volume on their full-on onslaught against Western Civilization?
All up they cost me $20 each for the large size (I am not bragging I just thought that the larger size would give me more options).
The upshot of all this is when we see a photo of ourselves, we usually end up thinking, "who's that funny big nosed, fat, old git who looks a bit like my mother/father?" And when everyone else says, "but it looks just like you!" we're horrified.
2. Microwaved with butter: FAIL, smell was still there and could not be covered by butter. Also tried vegan spread, same result.
When it's time to roast the bird, remove from the brine (discard brine) and rinse it really well, inside and out. Pat dry and place in roasting pan.
3) The secret project is almost done...it has been hard work, but I think all of you will like the project and appreciate the work I put into it :D...
Called Enhanced Standards of Conduct, the new guidelines given to all Secret Service personnel make clear that standards of behavior required in the United States apply on missions abroad, the sources said.
PAUL: What was the purpose of his call? No, I would ask him what can — what can we do to improve relations? Because I wouldn’t see them as likely to attack us. When I was drafted in October of ’62, that was a different world. I mean there were nuclear weapons in Cuba. That was a different story. But — but today to — not to talk to them and take the call and see what you can work out, helps — helps Castro. It hurts the people, the dissidents, the people who want to overthrow him have always had to be, you know, nationalistic and unified behind the leader.
The Battlestar Orion has recently returned from a 6 month training exercise in deep space. Docked in orbit over the Picon Colony, the Fleet Headquarters, the Orion has been on twelve of a twenty-four hour mandatory lock-down prior to its crew being able to make leave...
Just before you were killed, you told me that you were proud of me and how I lived my life. Mom, I hope I always make you proud of me. I hope my life reflects the best of your legacy. I will always love you.
About half an hour before baking, start preheating your oven to 450°F/250°C and heat up your baking vessel in it (as you can see, I used my Le Creuset enameled cast iron pot). When it is nice and hot, pull it out, dump the bread in (don't worry if it looks messy, once it is baked it won't), cover and bake for 30 minutes. After the half hour has passed, uncover and let bake for another 20 minutes so it turns crusty and golden.
DRAIN the oysters and dry them with a sheet or two of paper towel. Dredge them through the flour and shake off excess. DIP in egg mixture, shake off excess and then DREDGE in flour a second time. Heat oil in frying pan until hot (but not smoking), shake off excess flour on each oyster and place in oil, making sure you don’t crowd them. FRY oysters until golden brown on one side, then turn gently with tongs to brown the other side (approximately 3 minutes per side). REMOVE from pan and drain on paper towel for a moment. SQUEEZE lemon wedge lightly over hot oysters. STUFF each sandwich with 3 or 4 oysters, POUR two glasses of cold, crisp 2010 Dry Riesling and enjoy!
The nurse needed to ask me a few routine questions before the doctor came in for the examination.
She is a princess!
Stylistics – Here Comes The Sunrise
The opening disaster is possibly the best ever seen in a Final Destination movie. It feels positively apocalyptic; a giant bridge collapsing whilst laden with screaming idiots and traffic. It's still business as usual though, and the movie progresses in much the same manner as its four predecessors. There a few new ideas here and there, but nothing revolutionary. Tony Todd offers the soon-to-be-dead a tip hitherto unmentioned in any other Final Destination. Given how well it works, you'd think he'd have mentioned it at some point to Ali Larter or headless Stifler.
Spike Lee seems to have become a bit of a caricature of his former self. Much more Mars Blackmon then himself. That little guy at all the Knicks games screaming at everybody from Reggie Miller to Lebron James, all while his beloved squads have sucked! The little dude with the funny rimmed glasses, the funny walk, clap and loud mouth. The dude according to writers like Terrell Jermain Pryor are certified “haters” for being openly critical of the “quality” of work that the black community is receiving in cinema.
ran a home daycare for a few years when Andrew
-”Who?” The old woman asked.
The most bandages applied
Second shelf: Seasonal items in tubs: Snow, birthdays, swim, and crafts.
To kick off the campaign, the parents organized a time for me to come and talk to Countryside Elementary Kid’s Council in the morning. After this, scripts were written for each school for morning announcements to spread the word within all of the schools. We also designed posters for each school to put up in the main entrance of their school. The announcements to remind students to “turn of lights behind you” are made every morning during the week. Along with this, each elementary student got a Tolby light switch decal and kid-centered action guide. Woofta! With all this great work we were able to bring students attention to the simple energy saving action of: Turn off lights behind you.
Kim brought me a Sonic a little after noon (SO sweet), and Joe cooked himself an Egg Sausage Biscuit. He was feeling a lot better. He read some books, and I just laid around more. I got a call from the school saying that Jake was now sick too. I texted CPT to go and pick him up. I had a headache, and couldn't drive. I didn't feel nauseous, but I couldn't drive. He was busy, but I said that I'd cook his lunch (somehow), and then he'd have time (barely) to go and get him. I'm SO glad I'm not a single parent this year! It was SO hard last year!
5 March 2012
Plenty of people, here and abroad, would agree with this take on the recent Argentine past; lots of others wouldn’t. Barrionuevo’s article would make for a fine op-ed or a piece of what the Times loves to call “news analysis.” But to present this as straight news reporting — it’s what I expect from Rupert Murdoch, not from the New York Times.
Yesterday morning a person accidentally dropped his watch into the water-closet of the King and Queen public-house, Duke-street, Manchester-square, on which he offered 10s. to any one who would go down after it. A man named James Watkins, a nightman, embraced the offer, and went down, but remaining a longer time than was necessary, another man nammed Challice went down after him, when he continued there the same way; and on calling, no answer being received from their of them, a man named Turner consented to go down to ascertain the cause. A rope was accordingly tied round his body, and he was let down half way, when he called out to pull him up; they did so, and he was in a state of insensibility, and all but dead, and he now remains in a very dangerous condition. The boards were torn up, and the bodies of the other two were taken out quite dead and congealed blood coming from their noses. Mr. DAVIES, Surgeon, of 198, Oxford-street, attended and it appeared that the strong vapour caused by the closeness of the place caused their instant death on being let down. A Coroner's Inquest was held on the bodies. Verdict: "Died by Suffocation"
31 Anna Karenina – Leo Tolstoy *
(other than in dance recitals or shows)
gushed forth.
Masonry - Chavez Landscape
In bowling, young left-arm spinner Ravindra Jadeja’s spectacular showing (4-32) in the third ODI at Cuttack has raised hopes of finding a suitable partner for experienced offie Harbhajan Singh, more so at Eden, where the spinners have often played a decisive role.
“You’re an interesting species, an interesting mix. You’re capable of such beautiful dreams, and such horrible nightmares. You feel so lost, so cut off, so alone. Only you’re not. See, in all our searching, the only thing we’ve found that makes the emptiness bearable… is each other.”
My kids will go through many stages along the way. There will stumble and fall. And when they do, I will be there to help them stand back up or pick them up and carry them as needed.
His subsequent writing projects were more ambitious. He wrote a book, the subject of which escapes me at the moment, and bound it using a hole punch and yarn. He had an abundance of material with which to work. Our neighbor was a paper salesman, and when his samples became outdated, he brought them to Christian. There were boxes of all colors, shapes, and sizes of paper that kept my little rug rat busy for hours at a time. All his pursuits weren’t completely intellectual. One day after a long session with the hole punch and a pad of adhesive-backed paper, he appeared in the kitchen with tiny white dots all over his face. In textspeak, I was ROFL!! I was nothing if not a loving, appreciative audience. What else are mothers for? So he continued.
Add eggs, tomato ketchup, salt and pepper and whisk well
Without question, I’m the child of a narcissist…a parent who has difficulty understanding emotions, especially intense ones, and who is more comfortable in the role of objective observer or manager. When one is an empath, especially as a child, a parent like that is very difficult to get along with.
Table Runners:3
Yield: 12 to 14 servings
And we have one sweet little girl, less than two years old.
2) CONFLICT. It seems to me the kidnapping is the inciting incident, and then the pursuit and the recon into enemy territory is the main plot conflict. See if you can clarify all that in your second paragraph.
OKMULGEE, Okla. (AP) - The Oklahoma Highway Patrol says a portable methamphetamine lab exploded in a man’s pants as he tried to run away from a state trooper during a traffic stop.
For the couscous
And just an example, three of us we're sitting in the front hallway with the station speakers playing in the background when a song had just ended. It when really quiet for a few seconds, that's bad since it's our job to make sure that there is never more than 10 seconds of dead air playing at any time. After about 15 seconds we were about to get up and see what was wrong in the DJ booth when we heard birds coming out of the speakers, then monkeys, then a lion and back to birds. After about a minute of this, African music started playing and I mean like someone had just came off the boat and starting playing on the street for tips kind of stuff. As of now we're a rock station (mixed with a bit of techno if we have a DJ who wants to do a show on it), this is the last thing that should be on the night list if in a list at all.
Chinese overseas direct investments (ODI) in Africa, mostly initiated after 2006, have been the focus of widespread attention in recent years. Major investment destinations in that continent have been Algeria, Nigeria, South Africa, Sudan and Zambia. With South Africa, China has established a strategic relationship, partly because of the large ethnic Chinese population, estimated at over 100,000 and partly because of the country’s aspiration to become part of the BRIC alliance. A single investment by the Bank of China in South Africa’s Standard Bank amounted to $5.5 billion, more than the entire Chinese investment in the US to date.
This post has been a little hard to write. I've gone back and forth over whether to even write it.
You may have lost a child and are reminded each year of that loss. Or you may be desperately trying to get pregnant and this day is a reminder of your many failed attempts. You could have even lost your own mother and are reminded how much you miss her.
Bersih went global – Korea
I make this dip a lot for parties at Christmas time because of its beautiful colours. It always proves to be a massive hit so I thought I would try it out on Miss F. I have adapted the usual recipe for the young ones, as I know most littlies aren’t a fan of spicy foods.
Bake for 20-25 minutes until risen and golden. Cool on a wire rack.
Are older women either completely passive or evil because they represent aging, which we as a society fear? Is it a fear of the Freudian Oedipal complex? Or is it a way to keep women socially and ideologically oppressed?
1 reproduced
Jessi: I can’t listen to music while I’m writing either. I need quiet. But I do make playlists for each book, and usually I listen to those while I’m running, before I sit down to write for the day.
**On the workout front, I did my Pilates class last night and man, in combo with my biking on Wednesday night, my legs and lower half of my body are SORE!! LOVE IT!!! ***
Thanks for sticking by me through this. And honestly, I'm really okay. Love to you all.
The Keynote Address will be given by Lee Irwin, Ph.D., Lee Irwin is Professor and Chair of the Religious Studies Department at the College of Charleston. He is a scholar of world religions with an emphasis on Native American Traditions, western esotericism, hermeticism, contemporary spirituality, mystical cosmology, and transpersonal religious experience as related to dreams and visions. He is the Vice President of the Association for the Study of Esotericism (ASE) and a board member of the Sophia Institute and the Institute for Dream Studies. He has been a workshop leader and group facilitator for over twenty years, particularly in the areas of visionary cosmology and the development of the sacred human. He is the author of many books and articles, including: The Dream Seekers, Visionary Worlds, Awakening to Spirit: On Life, Illumination, and Being, The Alchemy of Soul, and Coming Down From Above: Prophecy, Resistance, and Renewal in Native American Religions.
There is a spot near the ear drum that, when touched the right way, "tingles," said 26-year-old ear picker Nguyen Thi Le Hang. "For one person, it may just be a tickle. For another person, it's a mind-blowing experience."
If you look closely at the cheque, our Food and Fun fair raised a total of $187 809.62! This just goes to show how successful the Food and Fun fair was last week, and also.. How generous the parishioners of OLPS!
1) Indiana Pacers (23-14) @ Miami Heat (30-9), Saturday/6:30 pm
Accessories: Butterfly dangly earrings from JUANITA TORTILLA
